Ohio, session 136, HB442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3521.01 be amended and new sections 3521.011, 3521.012, 3521.013, 3521.014, 3521.015, 3521.016, 3521.017, 3521.018, 3521.019, 3521.0110, 3521.0111, 3521.0112, 3521.0113, 3521.0114, and 3521.0115 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3521.01. (A) As used in sections 3521.01 to 3521.0115 of the Revised Code, "census block" and "county" block," "county," and "voting district" have the same meanings and describe the same geographical boundaries as used by the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census, in reporting the 2020 decennial census of Ohio. The official report of the 2020 decennial census of Ohio and all official documents relating to that report of that census are hereby incorporated by reference into sections 3521.01 to 3521.0115 of the Revised Code. (B) For the purpose of election of representatives to congress, the state is divided into districts as described in sections 3521.011 to 3521.0115 of the Revised Code. Any county or part of a county of the state that has not been described as included in one of those districts is included within the district that contains the least population according to the 2020 decennial census referred to in this section and that is contiguous to that county or part of that county. Sec. 3521.011. The first congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Hamilton ADDYSTON A AMBERLEY A AMBERLEY B AMBERLEY C AMBERLEY D ANDERSON A ANDERSON AA ANDERSON B ANDERSON BB ANDERSON C ANDERSON CC ANDERSON D ANDERSON DD ANDERSON E ANDERSON EE ANDERSON F ANDERSON FF ANDERSON G ANDERSON H ANDERSON I ANDERSON J ANDERSON K ANDERSON L ANDERSON M ANDERSON N ANDERSON O ANDERSON P ANDERSON Q ANDERSON R ANDERSON S ANDERSON T ANDERSON U ANDERSON V ANDERSON W ANDERSON X ANDERSON Y ANDERSON Z ARLINGTON HGTS A BLUE ASH 1-A BLUE ASH 1-B BLUE ASH 2-A BLUE ASH 2-B BLUE ASH 2-C BLUE ASH 3-A BLUE ASH 3-B BLUE ASH 4-A BLUE ASH 4-B BLUE ASH 5-A BLUE ASH 5-B CHEVIOT 1-A CHEVIOT 2-A CHEVIOT 3-A CHEVIOT 4-A CINCINNATI 10-A CINCINNATI 10-B CINCINNATI 10-C CINCINNATI 11-A CINCINNATI 11-B CINCINNATI 11-C CINCINNATI 11-D CINCINNATI 12-A CINCINNATI 12-B CINCINNATI 12-C CINCINNATI 12-D CINCINNATI 12-E CINCINNATI 13-A CINCINNATI 13-B CINCINNATI 13-C CINCINNATI 13-D CINCINNATI 13-E CINCINNATI 13-F CINCINNATI 13-G CINCINNATI 13-H CINCINNATI 14-A CINCINNATI 14-B CINCINNATI 14-C CINCINNATI 14-D CINCINNATI 14-E CINCINNATI 14-F CINCINNATI 14-G CINCINNATI 14-H CINCINNATI 14-I CINCINNATI 15-A CINCINNATI 15-B CINCINNATI 15-C CINCINNATI 15-D CINCINNATI 15-E CINCINNATI 15-F CINCINNATI 15-G CINCINNATI 15-H CINCINNATI 15-I CINCINNATI 15-J CINCINNATI 16-A CINCINNATI 17-A CINCINNATI 17-B CINCINNATI 17-C CINCINNATI 18-A CINCINNATI 18-B CINCINNATI 19-A CINCINNATI 19-B CINCINNATI 19-C CINCINNATI 19-D CINCINNATI 1-A CINCINNATI 1-B CINCINNATI 1-C CINCINNATI 1-D CINCINNATI 1-E CINCINNATI 1-F CINCINNATI 1-G CINCINNATI 1-H CINCINNATI 1-I CINCINNATI 1-J CINCINNATI 1-K CINCINNATI 1-L CINCINNATI 1-M CINCINNATI 20-A CINCINNATI 20-B CINCINNATI 20-C CINCINNATI 20-D CINCINNATI 20-E CINCINNATI 21-A CINCINNATI 21-B CINCINNATI 21-C CINCINNATI 21-D CINCINNATI 21-E CINCINNATI 22-A CINCINNATI 22-B CINCINNATI 22-C CINCINNATI 23-A CINCINNATI 23-B CINCINNATI 23-C CINCINNATI 23-D CINCINNATI 23-E CINCINNATI 23-F CINCINNATI 23-G CINCINNATI 23-H CINCINNATI 23-I CINCINNATI 23-J CINCINNATI 23-K CINCINNATI 23-L CINCINNATI 23-M CINCINNATI 23-N CINCINNATI 23-O CINCINNATI 23-P CINCINNATI 23-Q CINCINNATI 23-R CINCINNATI 24-A CINCINNATI 24-B CINCINNATI 24-C CINCINNATI 24-D CINCINNATI 24-E CINCINNATI 24-F CINCINNATI 24-G CINCINNATI 24-H CINCINNATI 24-I CINCINNATI 25-A CINCINNATI 25-B CINCINNATI 25-C CINCINNATI 25-D CINCINNATI 25-E CINCINNATI 25-F CINCINNATI 25-G CINCINNATI 25-H CINCINNATI 25-I CINCINNATI 25-J CINCINNATI 25-K CINCINNATI 25-L CINCINNATI 26-A CINCINNATI 26-B CINCINNATI 26-C CINCINNATI 26-D CINCINNATI 26-E CINCINNATI 26-F CINCINNATI 26-G CINCINNATI 26-H CINCINNATI 26-I CINCINNATI 26-J CINCINNATI 26-K CINCINNATI 26-L CINCINNATI 26-M CINCINNATI 26-N CINCINNATI 26-O CINCINNATI 26-P CINCINNATI 26-Q CINCINNATI 26-R CINCINNATI 26-S CINCINNATI 2-A CINCINNATI 2-B CINCINNATI 2-C CINCINNATI 2-D CINCINNATI 2-E CINCINNATI 2-F CINCINNATI 2-G CINCINNATI 2-H CINCINNATI 2-I CINCINNATI 2-J CINCINNATI 2-K CINCINNATI 3-A CINCINNATI 3-B CINCINNATI 3-C CINCINNATI 3-D CINCINNATI 3-E CINCINNATI 4-A CINCINNATI 4-B CINCINNATI 4-C CINCINNATI 4-D CINCINNATI 4-E CINCINNATI 4-F CINCINNATI 4-G CINCINNATI 4-H CINCINNATI 5-A CINCINNATI 5-B CINCINNATI 5-C CINCINNATI 5-D CINCINNATI 5-E CINCINNATI 5-F CINCINNATI 5-G CINCINNATI 5-H CINCINNATI 5-I CINCINNATI 6-A CINCINNATI 6-B CINCINNATI 6-C CINCINNATI 6-D CINCINNATI 6-E CINCINNATI 7-A CINCINNATI 7-B CINCINNATI 7-C CINCINNATI 7-D CINCINNATI 7-E CINCINNATI 7-F CINCINNATI 7-G CINCINNATI 7-H CINCINNATI 7-I CINCINNATI 7-J CINCINNATI 7-K CINCINNATI 8-A CINCINNATI 8-B CINCINNATI 8-C CINCINNATI 8-D CINCINNATI 9-A CINCINNATI 9-B CINCINNATI 9-C CINCINNATI 9-D CLEVES A CLEVES B COLERAIN A COLERAIN AA COLERAIN B COLERAIN BB COLERAIN C COLERAIN CC COLERAIN D COLERAIN DD COLERAIN E COLERAIN EE COLERAIN F COLERAIN FF COLERAIN G COLERAIN GG COLERAIN H COLERAIN HH COLERAIN I COLERAIN II COLERAIN J COLERAIN JJ COLERAIN K COLERAIN KK COLERAIN L COLERAIN LL COLERAIN M COLERAIN N COLERAIN O COLERAIN P COLERAIN Q COLERAIN R COLERAIN S COLERAIN T COLERAIN U COLERAIN V COLERAIN W COLERAIN X COLERAIN Y COLERAIN Z COLUMBIA B COLUMBIA C COLUMBIA D COLUMBIA E COLUMBIA F COLUMBIA G All C Hamilton COLUMBIA L 390610244013007 D Hamilton CROSBY A CROSBY B DEER PARK 1-A DEER PARK 2-A DEER PARK 3-A DEER PARK 4-A DELHI A DELHI B DELHI C DELHI D DELHI E DELHI F DELHI G DELHI H DELHI I DELHI J DELHI K DELHI L DELHI M DELHI N DELHI O DELHI P DELHI Q DELHI R DELHI S ELMWOOD A EVENDALE A EVENDALE B EVENDALE C FAIRFAX A FOREST PARK A FOREST PARK B FOREST PARK C FOREST PARK D FOREST PARK E FOREST PARK F FOREST PARK G FOREST PARK H FOREST PARK I FOREST PARK J FOREST PARK K FOREST PARK L FOREST PARK M GLENDALE A GLENDALE B GOLF MANOR A GOLF MANOR B GREEN A GREEN AA GREEN B GREEN BB GREEN C GREEN CC GREEN D GREEN DD GREEN E GREEN EE GREEN F GREEN FF GREEN G GREEN GG GREEN H GREEN HH GREEN I GREEN II GREEN J GREEN JJ GREEN K GREEN KK GREEN L GREEN LL GREEN M GREEN MM GREEN N GREEN NN GREEN O GREEN OO GREEN P GREEN PP GREEN Q GREEN QQ GREEN R GREEN S GREEN T GREEN U GREEN V GREEN W GREEN X GREEN Y GREEN Z GREENHILLS A GREENHILLS B GREENHILLS C HARR TWP AA HARR TWP BB HARR TWP CC HARRISON A HARRISON B HARRISON C HARRISON D HARRISON E HARRISON F LINCOLN HGTS A LINCOLN HGTS B LOCKLAND A LOCKLAND B MARIEMONT A MARIEMONT B MIAMI TWP A MIAMI TWP B MIAMI TWP C MIAMI TWP D MIAMI TWP E MIAMI TWP F MIAMI TWP G MIAMI TWP H MONTGOMERY A MONTGOMERY B MONTGOMERY C MONTGOMERY D MONTGOMERY E MONTGOMERY F MONTGOMERY G MONTGOMERY H MONTGOMERY I MT HEALTHY 1-A MT HEALTHY 2-A MT HEALTHY 3-A MT HEALTHY 4-A NEWTOWN A NEWTOWN B NO COLL HILL 1-A NO COLL HILL 1-B NO COLL HILL 2-A NO COLL HILL 3-A NO COLL HILL 4-A NO COLL HILL 4-B NO COLL HILL 4-C NORTH BEND A NORWOOD 1-A NORWOOD 1-B NORWOOD 1-C NORWOOD 2-A NORWOOD 2-B NORWOOD 2-C NORWOOD 3-A NORWOOD 3-B NORWOOD 3-C NORWOOD 4-A NORWOOD 4-B NORWOOD 4-C READING 1-A READING 1-B READING 2-A READING 2-B READING 3-A READING 3-B READING 4-A READING 4-B SHARONVILLE 1-A SHARONVILLE 1-B SHARONVILLE 2-A SHARONVILLE 3-A SHARONVILLE 3-B SHARONVILLE 4-A SHARONVILLE 4-B All E Hamilton SILVERTON A 390610238003000 390610238003001 390610238003002 390610238003003 390610238003004 390610238003005 390610238003006 390610238005002 390610238005004 390610238005005 390610238005007 F Hamilton SILVERTON C 390610238001000 390610238001001 390610238001002 390610238001003 390610238003007 390610238003008 390610238005000 390610238005001 390610240014001 390610240014003 390610240014004 390610240014005 G Hamilton SPRINGDALE A SPRINGDALE B SPRINGDALE C SPRINGDALE D SPRINGDALE E SPRINGDALE F SPRINGDALE G SPRINGDALE H SPRINGFIELD A SPRINGFIELD AA SPRINGFIELD B SPRINGFIELD BB SPRINGFIELD C SPRINGFIELD D SPRINGFIELD E SPRINGFIELD F SPRINGFIELD G SPRINGFIELD H SPRINGFIELD I SPRINGFIELD J SPRINGFIELD K SPRINGFIELD L SPRINGFIELD M SPRINGFIELD N SPRINGFIELD O SPRINGFIELD P SPRINGFIELD Q SPRINGFIELD R SPRINGFIELD S SPRINGFIELD T SPRINGFIELD U SPRINGFIELD V SPRINGFIELD W SPRINGFIELD X SPRINGFIELD Y SPRINGFIELD Z ST BERNARD 1-A ST BERNARD 2-A ST BERNARD 3-A ST BERNARD 4-A SYCAMORE A SYCAMORE B SYCAMORE C SYCAMORE D SYCAMORE E SYCAMORE F SYCAMORE G SYCAMORE H SYCAMORE I SYCAMORE J SYCAMORE K SYCAMORE L SYCAMORE M SYCAMORE N TERRACE PARK A TERRACE PARK B WHITEWATER A WHITEWATER B WHITEWATER C WOODLAWN A WOODLAWN B WYOMING A WYOMING B WYOMING C WYOMING D WYOMING E All Sec. 3521.012. The second congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Adams All All C Brown All All D Clark CHAS 1 CHAS TWP CITY 11 CITY 15 CITY 16 CITY 17 All E Clark CITY 25 390230007002004 390230007002005 390230007002006 390230007002007 390230019001022 390230034001071 F Clark CITY 26 CITY 27 CITY 31 CITY 32 CITY 33 CITY 34 CITY 35 CITY 36 CITY 37 GERM 1 GERM 2 GERM 3 GERM 4 GERM 5 HARM 1 HARM 2 MFLD 1 MFLD 10 MFLD 2 MFLD 3 MFLD 4 MFLD 5 MFLD 6 MFLD 7 MFLD 8 MFLD 9 PIKE 1 PIKE 2 PLES 1 PLES 2 T-1 T-2 All G Clermont All All H Clinton All All I Fayette All All J Hamilton COLUMBIA A COLUMBIA H COLUMBIA I COLUMBIA J COLUMBIA K All K Hamilton COLUMBIA L 390610244012014 390610244012015 390610244013010 L Hamilton INDIAN HILL A INDIAN HILL B INDIAN HILL C INDIAN HILL D INDIAN HILL E INDIAN HILL F LOVELAND A LOVELAND B LOVELAND C LOVELAND D LOVELAND E LOVELAND F LOVELAND G MADEIRA A MADEIRA B MADEIRA C MADEIRA D MADEIRA E MADEIRA F MADEIRA G MADEIRA H All M Hamilton SILVERTON A 390610238004007 390610238004008 390610238004009 390610238005003 390610238005006 390610238005008 390610238005009 N Hamilton SILVERTON B All O Hamilton SILVERTON C 390610238001004 390610238001005 390610238001006 390610238002007 390610238002009 390610238002021 390610238004000 390610238004012 P Hamilton SYMMES A SYMMES B SYMMES C SYMMES D SYMMES E SYMMES F SYMMES G SYMMES H SYMMES I SYMMES J SYMMES K SYMMES L All Q Highland All All R Jackson PRECINCT HAMILTON PRECINCT JACKSON All S Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 2-A 390799575001003 390799575001004 390799575001007 390799575001008 390799575001009 390799575001010 390799575001011 390799575003000 390799575003001 390799575003004 390799575003005 390799575003006 390799575003007 390799575003008 390799575003009 390799576003025 390799576003026 T Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 3-A 390799575002000 390799575002003 U Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 4-A PRECINCT JEFFERSON I PRECINCT JEFFERSON II PRECINCT LIBERTY I PRECINCT LIBERTY II All V Jackson PRECINCT LICK I 390799575003002 390799576003006 W Jackson PRECINCT MADISON I PRECINCT MADISON II PRECINCT OAK HILL I PRECINCT OAK HILL II PRECINCT SCIOTO I PRECINCT SCIOTO II All X Madison All All Y Pickaway All All Z Pike All All AA Ross All All AB Scioto All All Sec. 3521.013. The third congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Franklin BEXLEY 1-A BEXLEY 1-B BEXLEY 2-A BEXLEY 2-B BEXLEY 3-A BEXLEY 3-B BEXLEY 3-C BEXLEY 4-A BEXLEY 4-B BEXLEY 4-C All C Franklin BLENDON-C 390490071121010 390490071121013 390490071121014 390490071123003 390490071123010 390490071123012 390490071123015 390490071123016 390490071123017 390490071123018 390490071123019 390490071123030 390490071123031 390490071131012 390490071131015 390490071131018 390490071131019 390490071131021 390490071131023 390490071131024 390490071132003 390490071132005 390490071132017 390490071132018 390490071144011 390490071144024 390490071154002 390490071155000 390490071155002 390490071203029 390490071203031 390490071203033 390490071203034 390490071203036 390490071203038 390490071992000 390490071992001 390490071992002 390490071992010 390490071992015 390490071992021 390490071992031 390490071992034 390490072021015 390490072022011 390490072022012 390490072022016 D Franklin CANAL WIN-A CANAL WIN-B CANAL WIN-C CANAL WIN-D CANAL WIN-E CANAL WIN-F CLINTON-A CLINTON-B COLS 01-A COLS 01-B COLS 01-C All E Franklin COLS 02-A 390490056101006 390490056101007 390490056101010 390490056101011 390490056101016 390490056101017 390490056101018 390490056101019 390490056101020 390490056101022 390490056101033 390490056101034 390490056101035 390490056101036 390490056201002 390490056201003 390490056201004 390490056201005 390490056201008 390490056201009 390490056201010 390490056201011 390490056202003 390490056202004 390490056202005 390490056203003 390490056203004 390490056203005 390490056203006 390490056203012 390490056203013 390490056204000 390490056204002 390490056204003 390490056204004 390490056204007 390490056204008 390490056204009 390490056204010 390490056204011 390490056204012 390490056204013 390490056204014 390490056204015 F Franklin COLS 02-B 390490058101017 390490058101018 390490058101019 390490058101024 390490058101025 390490058101026 390490058102000 390490058102001 390490058102002 390490058102003 390490058102004 390490058102005 390490058102006 390490058102007 390490058102008 390490058103000 390490058103001 390490058103004 390490058103005 390490058103006 390490058103029 G Franklin COLS 03-A COLS 03-B COLS 03-C COLS 03-D COLS 04-A COLS 04-B COLS 04-C COLS 04-D COLS 05-A COLS 05-B COLS 05-C COLS 05-D COLS 06-A COLS 06-B COLS 06-C COLS 06-D COLS 06-E COLS 06-F COLS 07-A COLS 07-B COLS 07-C COLS 07-D COLS 07-E COLS 08-A COLS 08-B All H Franklin COLS 08-E 390490040012014 390490040012015 390490040012016 390490040012017 390490040012018 390490040012019 390490040012020 390490040012021 390490040012022 390490040012023 390490040012024 390490040012025 390490040012026 390490040012027 390490040012028 390490040012029 390490040012030 390490040012031 390490040012032 390490040021018 390490040021019 390490040021020 390490040021021 390490040021022 390490040021023 390490040021024 390490040022028 390490040022029 390490040022030 390490040022031 390490040022032 390490040022043 390490040022044 390490040022045 390490040022046 390490040022047 390490040022048 390490040022051 390490040022052 390490040022053 390490040022054 390490040022055 390490040022056 390490040022057 390490040022058 390490040022059 390490040022060 390490040022061 390490040022062 390490040022063 390490040022064 390490040022065 390490040022066 390490040022067 390490040022068 390490040022069 390490040022070 390490040022071 390490052002007 390490057004000 390490057004011 390490057004012 I Franklin COLS 08-F COLS 08-G COLS 08-H All J Franklin COLS 09-A 390490049001001 K Franklin COLS 10-B 390490043012008 390490043012009 390490043012010 390490082411000 390490082411001 390490082411002 390490082411003 390490082411004 390490082411005 390490082411006 390490082411007 390490082411008 390490082411009 390490082411010 390490082411012 390490082411014 390490082411016 390490082411017 390490082411018 390490082411019 390490082411023 390490082411024 390490082411046 390490082411047 390490082411048 390490082411049 390490082411050 390490082412022 390490082412023 390490082412024 390490082412025 390490082412026 390490082412027 390490082412028 390490082412030 390490082412031 390490082412035 390490082412036 390490082412037 390490082412038 390490082412039 390490082412040 390490082412041 390490082412042 390490082412044 390490082412045 390490082424002 390490082424012 390490082424018 390490082424021 390490082424024 390490082424031 390490082424035 L Franklin COLS 10-C 390490045002000 390490045002001 390490047001000 390490047001001 390490047002000 390490047002001 390490049005001 390490049005002 390490049005003 390490049005004 390490049005005 390490049005006 390490049005010 390490049005015 390490049005016 390490049006000 390490049006001 390490049006002 390490049006003 390490082411025 M Franklin COLS 10-D COLS 10-E COLS 11-A COLS 11-B COLS 11-C COLS 11-D COLS 11-E COLS 12-A COLS 12-B COLS 12-C COLS 12-D COLS 12-E COLS 13-A COLS 13-B COLS 13-C COLS 13-D COLS 16-C All N Franklin COLS 16-D 390490013011001 390490013011002 390490013011003 390490013021000 390490013021003 390490013021004 O Franklin COLS 16-F COLS 17-A COLS 17-B COLS 17-C COLS 17-D All P Franklin COLS 22-D 390490077302000 390490077302001 390490077302002 390490077302003 390490077302004 390490077302005 390490077302007 390490077302008 390490077302009 390490077302010 390490077302011 390490077302012 390490077302013 390490077302014 390490077302015 390490077302016 390490077401005 390490077401006 390490077401007 390490077401008 390490077401009 390490077401010 390490077401013 390490077401015 390490077401016 390490077401017 390490077401018 Q Franklin COLS 22-E COLS 22-F COLS 23-A COLS 23-B COLS 23-C COLS 23-D COLS 24-A COLS 24-B All R Franklin COLS 24-C 390490003101012 390490003101013 390490003102023 390490003102024 390490003102025 390490003102026 390490003102027 390490003102028 390490003102031 390490003102032 390490003102033 390490003102034 390490003102038 390490003303002 390490003303003 390490003303004 390490003303008 390490007104001 390490007104002 390490007104003 390490007104009 390490007104010 390490007104014 S Franklin COLS 24-D COLS 24-E COLS 25-A COLS 25-B COLS 25-C COLS 25-D COLS 25-E COLS 25-F COLS 25-G COLS 25-H COLS 26-A COLS 26-B COLS 26-C COLS 27-A COLS 27-B COLS 27-C COLS 27-D COLS 27-E COLS 27-F COLS 28-A COLS 28-B COLS 28-C COLS 28-D COLS 28-E COLS 28-F COLS 29-A COLS 29-B COLS 29-C COLS 29-D COLS 30-A COLS 30-B All T Franklin COLS 30-C 390490069211000 390490069211001 390490069211002 390490069211003 390490069212006 390490069212007 390490069212008 390490069212009 390490069214003 390490069214004 390490069214007 390490069214008 390490069214009 390490069214010 390490069214011 390490069214012 390490069214013 U Franklin COLS 30-D COLS 30-E COLS 31-A COLS 31-B COLS 31-C COLS 31-D COLS 31-E COLS 32-A COLS 32-B COLS 32-C COLS 32-D COLS 34-A COLS 34-B COLS 34-C COLS 34-D COLS 34-E COLS 34-F COLS 35-A COLS 35-B COLS 35-C COLS 35-D COLS 36-A COLS 36-B COLS 36-C COLS 36-D COLS 36-E All V Franklin COLS 37-B 390490051001000 390490051001001 390490051001003 390490051001004 390490051001006 390490051001007 390490051001008 390490051002005 390490051002006 390490051002007 390490051002008 390490051002010 390490051002013 390490051002023 390490051002024 390490051002025 390490051002031 390490051002032 390490051002033 390490051002034 390490051002035 390490051002036 390490051002037 390490051002038 390490051002039 390490051002042 390490051002044 390490051002045 390490051002046 390490051002047 390490051002048 390490051002049 W Franklin COLS 37-C COLS 37-D COLS 37-E COLS 38-A COLS 38-B All X Franklin COLS 38-C 390490049001002 390490049001004 390490049001005 390490049001006 390490049001007 390490049001008 390490049001009 390490049001010 390490049001011 390490049001012 390490049001013 390490049001014 390490049001015 390490049001016 390490049001017 390490049001018 390490049001019 390490049001020 390490049002000 390490049002001 390490049002002 390490049002003 390490049002004 390490049002005 390490049002006 390490049002007 390490049002008 390490049002009 390490049002011 390490049002012 390490051002019 390490051002028 390490083301000 390490083301001 390490083301010 Y Franklin COLS 41-E COLS 42-A COLS 42-B COLS 42-C COLS 42-D COLS 42-E All Z Franklin COLS 43-A 390490003101004 390490003102000 390490003102001 390490003102002 390490003102003 390490003102004 390490003102005 390490003102006 390490003102007 390490003102010 390490003102011 390490003102012 390490003102013 390490003102014 390490003102022 390490003102037 AA Franklin COLS 43-B COLS 43-C COLS 43-D COLS 43-E COLS 44-A COLS 44-B COLS 44-C COLS 44-D COLS 44-E COLS 44-F COLS 44-G COLS 44-H COLS 45-A COLS 45-B COLS 45-C COLS 45-D COLS 45-E COLS 45-F COLS 45-G COLS 45-H COLS 45-I COLS 45-J COLS 45-K COLS 45-L COLS 45-M COLS 45-N COLS 45-O COLS 46-A COLS 46-B COLS 46-C COLS 46-D COLS 46-E COLS 46-F COLS 46-G COLS 46-H COLS 46-I COLS 46-J COLS 46-K COLS 46-L COLS 46-M COLS 47-A COLS 47-B COLS 47-C COLS 47-D COLS 47-E COLS 47-F COLS 48-A COLS 48-B COLS 48-C COLS 48-D COLS 48-E COLS 49-A COLS 49-B COLS 49-C COLS 49-D COLS 49-E COLS 49-F COLS 49-G COLS 49-H COLS 50-A COLS 50-B COLS 50-C COLS 50-D COLS 50-E COLS 51-A COLS 51-B COLS 51-C COLS 51-D COLS 52-A COLS 52-B COLS 52-C COLS 52-D COLS 52-E COLS 52-F COLS 52-G COLS 52-H COLS 53-A COLS 53-B COLS 53-C COLS 53-D COLS 53-E COLS 53-F COLS 53-G COLS 53-H COLS 54-A COLS 54-B COLS 54-C COLS 54-D COLS 54-E COLS 54-F COLS 55-A COLS 55-B COLS 55-C COLS 55-D COLS 56-A COLS 56-B COLS 56-C COLS 56-D COLS 56-E COLS 57-A COLS 57-B COLS 57-C COLS 57-D COLS 57-E COLS 57-F COLS 57-G COLS 58-A COLS 58-B COLS 58-C COLS 58-D COLS 58-E COLS 58-F COLS 58-G COLS 58-H COLS 58-I COLS 58-J COLS 58-K COLS 61-A COLS 61-B COLS 61-C All AB Franklin COLS 61-D 390490069442005 390490069444002 390490069444003 390490069444005 390490069444006 390490069444007 390490069444009 390490069444011 390490069444012 390490069444013 390490069444015 390490069444016 390490069444017 390490069444019 390490069451000 390490069451001 390490069451002 390490069451004 390490069451005 390490069921000 AC Franklin COLS 62-A All AD Franklin COLS 62-B 390490071992005 390490071992009 390490071992011 390490071992016 390490071992017 390490071992018 390490071992019 390490071992022 390490071992023 390490071992024 390490071992025 390490071992026 390490071992027 390490071992028 390490071992029 390490071992030 390490071992032 390490071992033 390490071992035 390490071992036 390490071992037 390490071992038 390490071992039 390490071992040 390490071992041 AE Franklin COLS 62-D COLS 62-E COLS 66-A COLS 66-B COLS 66-C COLS 66-D COLS 66-E All AF Franklin COLS 66-F 390490071141022 390490071142004 390490071142005 390490071142006 390490071142007 390490071142008 390490071143001 390490071143015 390490071143016 390490071143017 390490071143019 390490071143020 390490071143021 390490071144006 390490071144007 390490071144008 390490071144009 390490071144010 390490071144012 390490071144022 390490071144025 390490071144026 390490071144027 390490071203001 390490071203002 390490071203005 AG Franklin COLS 67-A COLS 67-B COLS 67-C COLS 67-D COLS 67-E COLS 67-F COLS 67-G COLS 67-H COLS 67-I COLS 68-A COLS 68-B COLS 68-C COLS 68-D All AH Franklin COLS 77-A 390490082412013 390490082412014 390490082421016 390490082421017 390490082422026 390490082422032 390490082422037 390490082422038 390490082422042 AI Franklin COLS 78-D COLS 78-H COLS 79-A COLS 79-B COLS 79-C COLS 79-D COLS 79-E COLS 81-A COLS 81-B COLS 81-C COLS 81-D COLS 81-E COLS 83-A COLS 83-B COLS 83-C COLS 83-D COLS 83-E COLS 83-F COLS 83-G COLS 83-H COLS 83-I COLS 83-J COLS 84-A COLS 84-B COLS 84-C COLS 84-D COLS 84-E COLS 84-F COLS 84-G COLS 84-H COLS 85-A COLS 85-B COLS 85-C COLS 85-D COLS 85-E COLS 86-A COLS 86-B COLS 86-C COLS 86-D COLS 86-E COLS 86-F COLS 86-G COLS 86-H COLS 86-I COLS 86-J COLS 87-A COLS 87-B COLS 87-C COLS 87-D COLS 87-E FRANKLIN-A FRANKLIN-B All AJ Franklin FRANKLIN-C 390490082101006 390490082102045 390490082102046 390490082102047 390490082102055 390490082411011 390490082411013 390490082411015 390490082411020 390490082411021 390490082411022 390490082411029 390490082411030 390490082411032 390490082411045 390490082412001 390490082412010 390490082412011 390490082412012 390490082412017 390490082412018 390490082412019 390490082412020 390490082412021 390490082412029 390490082412032 390490082412033 390490082412034 390490082412043 390490082412046 390490082412047 390490082421003 390490082421004 390490082421018 390490082421019 390490082421020 390490082421021 390490082421025 390490082421026 390490082421027 390490082421032 390490082421038 390490082422000 390490082422001 390490082422003 390490082422007 390490082422012 390490082422013 390490082422023 390490082422027 390490082422033 390490082422039 390490082422040 390490082422041 390490082422044 390490082423000 390490082423003 390490082423008 390490082423009 390490082423010 390490082423021 390490082423032 390490082424000 390490082424001 390490082424003 390490082424004 390490082424006 390490082424007 390490082424008 390490082424009 390490082424010 390490082424011 390490082424017 390490082424019 390490082424020 390490082424022 390490082424023 390490082424030 390490082424032 390490082424033 390490082424034 390490082424037 390490082424039 AK Franklin FRANKLIN-D FRANKLIN-E FRANKLIN-F GAH 1-A GAH 1-B GAH 1-C GAH 1-D GAH 1-E GAH 1-F GAH 1-G GAH 2-A GAH 2-B GAH 2-C GAH 2-D GAH 2-E GAH 2-F GAH 2-G GAH 2-H GAH 2-I GAH 3-A GAH 3-B GAH 3-C GAH 3-D GAH 3-E GAH 3-F GAH 3-G GAH 4-A GAH 4-B GAH 4-C GAH 4-D GAH 4-E GAH 4-F GAH 4-G GROVE CITY 1-A GROVE CITY 1-B GROVE CITY 1-C GROVE CITY 1-D GROVE CITY 1-E GROVE CITY 1-F GROVE CITY 1-G GROVE CITY 2-A GROVE CITY 2-B GROVE CITY 2-C GROVE CITY 2-D GROVE CITY 2-E GROVE CITY 2-F GROVE CITY 2-G GROVE CITY 3-A GROVE CITY 3-B GROVE CITY 3-C GROVE CITY 3-D GROVE CITY 3-E GROVE CITY 3-F GROVE CITY 3-G GROVE CITY 3-H GROVE CITY 4-A GROVE CITY 4-B GROVE CITY 4-C GROVE CITY 4-D GROVE CITY 4-E GROVE CITY 4-F GROVE CITY 4-G GROVEPORT-A GROVEPORT-B GROVEPORT-C GROVEPORT-D GROVEPORT-E HAMILTON-A HAMILTON-B HAMILTON-C JACKSON-A JACKSON-B JACKSON-C JACKSON-D JEFFERSON-A JEFFERSON-B JEFFERSON-C JEFFERSON-D JEFFERSON-E JEFFERSON-F JEFFERSON-G JEFFERSON-H JEFFERSON-I JEFFERSON-J MADISON-A MADISON-B MADISON-C MADISON-D MADISON-E MADISON-F MADISON-G MADISON-H MIFFLIN-A MIFFLIN-B MINERVA PARK-A All AL Franklin NORWICH-A 390490079412021 390490079412026 390490079412030 AM Franklin OBETZ-A OBETZ-B OBETZ-C PLEASANT-A PLEASANT-B PLEASANT-C PLEASANT-D PLEASANT-E PLEASANT-F PRAIRIE-A PRAIRIE-B All AN Franklin PRAIRIE-C 390490081651001 390490081651002 390490081651003 390490081651004 390490081651007 390490081651009 390490081651010 390490081652008 AO Franklin PRAIRIE-D PRAIRIE-E PRAIRIE-F PRAIRIE-G PRAIRIE-H PRAIRIE-I PRAIRIE-J PRAIRIE-K PRAIRIE-L PRAIRIE-M REYNS 1-A REYNS 1-B REYNS 1-C REYNS 1-D REYNS 1-E REYNS 1-F REYNS 1-G REYNS 2-A REYNS 2-B REYNS 2-C REYNS 2-D REYNS 2-E REYNS 2-F REYNS 2-G REYNS 3-A REYNS 3-B REYNS 4-A REYNS 4-B REYNS 4-C REYNS 4-D REYNS 4-E REYNS 4-F REYNS 4-G All AP Franklin SHARON-A 390490069312001 390490069444004 390490069444008 390490069444010 390490069444014 390490069444018 390490069444020 390490069444021 390490069444022 390490069444023 390490069451003 390490069451006 390490069451010 AQ Franklin TRURO-A TRURO-B URBANCREST-A VALLEYVIEW-A WHITEHALL 1-A WHITEHALL 1-B WHITEHALL 2-A WHITEHALL 2-B WHITEHALL 2-C WHITEHALL 3-A WHITEHALL 3-B WHITEHALL 3-C WHITEHALL 4-A WHITEHALL 4-B WHITEHALL 4-C All Sec. 3521.014. The fourth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Allen All All C Auglaize All All D Champaign All All E Crawford Bucyrus 1A 390339744001027 390339744001038 390339744001043 390339744001045 390339744001046 390339744001047 390339744001049 390339744001050 390339744001051 390339744001052 390339744001053 390339744001054 390339744001059 390339744001060 390339745002014 390339745002015 390339745002016 390339745002031 390339745002032 390339745002033 390339745002034 390339746001009 390339746001010 390339746001011 390339746001012 390339746001029 390339746001030 390339746001031 F Crawford Bucyrus 1B 390339744001003 390339744001011 390339744001012 390339744001030 390339744001033 390339744002000 390339744002012 390339744002013 390339744002014 390339744002015 390339744002016 390339744002017 390339744002028 390339744002029 390339744002030 390339744002031 390339744002032 390339744002033 390339744002034 390339744002035 390339744002036 390339744002037 390339744002038 390339744002042 390339744002043 390339744002044 390339744002045 390339744002046 390339744003004 390339744003005 390339744003006 390339744003007 390339744003012 390339744003013 390339744003014 390339744003015 390339744003016 390339744003017 390339744003020 390339744003025 390339745001000 390339745001001 G Crawford Bucyrus 2A Bucyrus 2B Bucyrus 3A Bucyrus 3B Bucyrus 3C Bucyrus 4A Bucyrus 4B Bucyrus Twp Dallas Twp All H Crawford Holmes-Texas 390339742003001 390339742003002 390339742003003 390339742003004 390339742003005 390339742003006 390339742003007 390339742003008 390339742003009 390339742003010 390339742003011 390339742003012 390339742003013 390339742003016 390339742003017 390339742003018 390339742003019 390339742003020 390339742003021 390339742003022 390339742003023 390339742003024 390339742003025 390339742003026 390339742003027 390339742003028 390339742003029 390339742003030 390339742003031 390339742003032 390339742003033 390339742003034 390339742003035 390339742003036 390339742003037 390339742003038 390339742003039 390339742003040 390339742003041 390339742003042 390339742003043 390339742003044 390339742003045 390339742003046 390339742003047 390339742003048 390339742003049 390339742003050 390339742003051 390339742003052 390339742003053 390339742003054 390339742003055 390339742003056 390339742003057 390339742003058 390339742003059 390339742003060 390339742003061 390339742003062 390339742003063 390339742003064 390339742003067 390339742003068 390339742003069 390339742003070 390339744001002 390339744001004 390339744001006 390339744001007 390339744001008 390339744001009 390339744001010 390339744001017 390339744001018 390339744001019 390339744001040 390339744001057 390339744002002 390339744002004 390339744002005 390339744002006 390339744002009 390339744002011 390339744002018 390339744003001 390339747001024 390339747001025 390339747001026 390339747001034 390339747001035 I Crawford Lykens-Tod 390339742002000 390339742002001 390339742002002 390339742002003 390339742002004 390339742002005 390339742002006 390339742002007 390339742002008 390339742002009 390339742002010 390339742002011 390339742002012 390339742002013 390339742002014 390339742002015 390339742002016 390339742002017 390339742002018 390339742002019 390339742002020 390339742002021 390339742002022 390339742002023 390339742002024 390339742002025 390339742002026 390339742002027 390339742002028 390339742002029 390339742002030 390339742002031 390339742002032 390339742002033 390339742002034 390339742002035 390339742002036 390339742002037 390339742002038 390339742002039 390339742002040 390339742002041 390339742002042 390339742002043 390339742002044 390339742002045 390339742002046 390339742002047 390339742002048 390339742002049 390339742002050 390339742002051 390339742002062 390339742002063 390339742002064 390339742002065 390339742002066 390339742002073 J Crawford Sandusky-Whetstone North 390339744001025 390339744001026 390339744001035 390339744001036 390339744001037 390339744001041 390339744001042 390339744001048 390339744001065 390339744001066 390339746001000 390339746001001 390339746001022 390339746003000 390339746003010 390339747001074 390339747001075 390339747001076 390339747001077 390339747001078 390339747001079 390339747001080 390339747001081 390339747001082 390339747001083 390339747001084 390339747001085 390339747001086 390339747002064 390339747002065 390339747002066 390339747002067 390339747002068 390339747002069 390339747002070 390339747002071 390339747003004 390339747003005 390339747003006 390339747003007 390339747003008 390339747003009 390339747003010 390339747003011 390339747003012 390339747003013 390339747003014 390339747003015 390339747003016 390339747003033 390339747003034 390339747003035 390339747003036 390339747003037 390339747003038 390339747003039 390339747003040 390339747003042 390339747003043 390339747004000 390339747004001 390339747004002 390339747004003 390339747004004 390339747004018 390339747004019 390339747004020 K Crawford Whetstone Twp South All L Defiance All All M Fulton All All N Hancock All All O Hardin All All P Henry All All Q Logan All All R Marion All All S Mercer All All T Miami BETHEL EAST BETHEL SOUTH CENTRAL BETHEL SOUTH EAST BETHEL WEST BRADFORD BROWN / FLETCHER COVINGTON A / B COVINGTON C / D ELIZABETH HUBER HEIGHTS A HUBER HEIGHTS B LOSTCREEK / CASSTOWN All U Miami MONROE EAST CENTRAL 391093550022002 V Miami NEWBERRY EAST NEWBERRY WEST PIQUA 1-A PIQUA 1-B / D PIQUA 1-C / E PIQUA 2-A PIQUA 2-B / C PIQUA 2-D PIQUA 3-A PIQUA 3-B / C PIQUA 3-D / E PIQUA 4-A PIQUA 4-B / C PIQUA 4-D / E PIQUA 5-A PIQUA 5-B PIQUA 5-C PIQUA 5-D SPRINGCREEK EAST SPRINGCREEK WEST All W Miami TIPP CITY D 391093550013002 391093550013003 391093550013013 391093550013014 391093550013015 X Miami TIPP CITY G 391093550012000 391093550013000 391093550013001 391093550013006 391093550013008 391093550013009 391093550013010 391093550021010 391093550021011 391093550021012 391093550021029 391093550022007 391093550022016 391093550022017 391093550022018 Y Miami TIPP CITY H WASHINGTON All Z Paulding All All AA Putnam All All AB Shelby All All AC Van Wert All All AD Williams All All Sec. 3521.015. The fifth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Ashland All All C Coshocton All All D Crawford Auburn Twp All E Crawford Bucyrus 1A 390339744001039 390339744001044 390339744001064 390339744004000 390339744004001 390339744004002 390339744004003 390339744004004 390339744004005 390339744004006 390339744004007 390339744004008 390339744004009 390339744004010 390339744004011 390339744004012 390339744004013 390339744004014 390339744004015 390339745002000 390339745002010 390339745002013 390339746001004 390339746001005 F Crawford Bucyrus 1B 390339744003002 390339744003003 390339744003008 390339744003009 390339744003010 390339744003011 390339744003026 390339744003027 390339744003028 G Crawford Chatfield Twp Cranberry Twp Crestline 1A Crestline 2A Crestline 3A Crestline 4A Galion 1A Galion 1B Galion 2A Galion 2B Galion 3A Galion 3B Galion 4A Galion 4B Galion 4C All H Crawford Holmes-Texas 390339742001006 390339742001007 390339742001008 390339742001009 390339742001010 390339742001011 390339742001012 390339742001013 390339742001026 390339742001027 390339742001028 390339742001029 390339742001030 390339742001031 390339742001032 390339742001033 390339742001034 390339742001035 390339742001036 390339742001037 390339742001038 390339742001039 390339742001040 390339742001041 390339742001042 390339742001043 390339742001044 390339742001045 390339742001074 390339742001089 390339742001090 390339742001091 390339742001093 390339742001094 390339742001095 390339742001096 390339742001097 390339742001098 390339742001099 390339742001101 390339742001102 390339742001103 I Crawford Jefferson Twp Liberty Twp All J Crawford Lykens-Tod 390339742001000 390339742001001 390339742001002 390339742001003 390339742001004 390339742001005 390339742001014 390339742001015 390339742001016 390339742001017 390339742001018 390339742001019 390339742001020 390339742001021 390339742001022 390339742001023 390339742001024 390339742001025 390339742001046 390339742001047 390339742001048 390339742001049 390339742001050 390339742001051 390339742001052 390339742001053 390339742001054 390339742001055 390339742001056 390339742001057 390339742001058 390339742001059 390339742001060 390339742001061 390339742001062 390339742001063 390339742001064 390339742001065 390339742001066 390339742001067 390339742001068 390339742001069 390339742001070 390339742001071 390339742001072 390339742001073 390339742001075 390339742001076 390339742001077 390339742001078 390339742001079 390339742001080 390339742001081 390339742001082 390339742001083 390339742001084 390339742001085 390339742001086 390339742001087 390339742001088 390339742001092 390339742001100 K Crawford Polk Twp All L Crawford Sandusky-Whetstone North 390339741004024 390339741004027 390339741004028 390339741004046 390339741004068 390339741004069 390339741004070 390339741004071 390339741004072 390339741004073 390339741004074 390339741004082 390339747002002 390339747002003 390339747002004 390339747002005 390339747002006 390339747002007 390339747002018 390339747002019 390339747002025 390339747002026 390339747002027 390339747002028 390339747002031 390339747002032 390339747002034 390339747002035 390339747002040 390339747002041 390339747002042 390339747002043 390339747002044 390339747002045 390339747002051 390339747002052 390339747002053 390339747002054 390339747002055 390339747002059 M Crawford Vernon Twp All N Holmes All All O Huron All All P Knox All All Q Morrow All All R Richland All All S Sandusky All All T Seneca All All U Tuscarawas AUBURN TWP BALTIC VILLAGE BUCKS TWP All V Tuscarawas GOSHEN TWP 4 391570215011055 391570215012043 391570215012044 391570215012045 391570215012062 391570215012064 391570215012072 W Tuscarawas JEFFERSON TWP & STONECREEK NEW PHILADELPHIA 4A NEW PHILADELPHIA 4B All X Tuscarawas NEW PHILADELPHIA 4C 391570215011039 391570215011040 391570215011042 391570215011043 391570215011044 391570215012020 391570215012023 391570215012024 391570215012025 391570215012026 391570215012035 391570215012036 391570215012037 391570215012038 391570215012039 391570215012040 391570215012041 391570215012042 391570215012046 391570215012047 391570215012048 391570215012049 391570215012050 391570215012051 391570215012052 391570215012053 391570215012056 391570215012057 391570215012058 391570215012061 391570215012063 391570215012065 391570215012066 Y Tuscarawas SUGARCREEK TWP SUGARCREEK VILLAGE 1 SUGARCREEK VILLAGE 2 YORK TWP All Z Wayne All All AA Wood BLOOM TWP NORTH BLOOM TWP SOUTH BOWLING GREEN 1-A BOWLING GREEN 1-B BOWLING GREEN 1-C BOWLING GREEN 2-A BOWLING GREEN 2-B BOWLING GREEN 2-C BOWLING GREEN 2-D BOWLING GREEN 2-F BOWLING GREEN 3-B BOWLING GREEN 3-C BOWLING GREEN 3-D BOWLING GREEN 3-E BOWLING GREEN 3-G BOWLING GREEN 4-A BOWLING GREEN 4-B BOWLING GREEN 4-D BOWLING GREEN 4-E BOWLING GREEN 4-H BOWLING GREEN 4-J CENTER TOWNSHIP FOSTORIA CITY FREEDOM TOWNSHIP FREEDOM TWP PEMBERVILLE GRAND RAPIDS TWP GR GRAND RAPIDS TWP PARK HENRY TWP HAMMANSBURG HENRY TWP N BALTIMORE A HENRY TWP N BALTIMORE B JACKSON TWP LIBERTY TWP MIDDLETON TWP DUNBRIDGE MIDDLETON TWP HASKINS MIDDLETON TWP NORTH MIDDLETON TWP SOUTH MILTON TWP MONTGOMERY TWP NE MONTGOMERY TWP SE MONTGOMERY TWP WEST PERRY TWP EAST PERRY TWP PERRY All AB Wood PERRYSBURG E 391730204021009 391730204021012 391730204021015 391730204021016 AC Wood PERRYSBURG G PERRYSBURG I PERRYSBURG K PERRYSBURG L All AD Wood PERRYSBURG O 391730204021019 391730204021020 391730204021021 AE Wood PERRYSBURG TWP FT MEIGS 391730206011024 391730206011027 391730206011028 391730206011029 391730206011030 391730206011031 391730206011032 391730206011033 391730206011034 391730206011037 391730206011038 391730206011039 391730206011042 391730206011043 391730206011044 391730206011045 391730206011046 391730206011048 391730206011052 391730206011053 391730206011055 391730206024011 391730206024028 391730206024029 391730206024030 391730212001006 AF Wood PERRYSBURG X 391730206011021 391730206011025 391730206011041 391730206011049 391730206024000 391730206024003 391730206024004 391730206024014 391730206024015 391730206024016 391730206024017 391730206024018 391730206024019 391730206024020 391730206024021 391730206024022 391730206024023 391730206024024 391730206024025 391730206024026 391730206024027 391730206024031 391730206024032 391730206024033 391730206024034 391730206024035 391730206024036 391730206024037 391730206024038 391730206024039 391730206024040 391730206024041 391730206024043 AG Wood PLAIN TWP PORTAGE TOWNSHIP EAST PORTAGE TOWNSHIP WEST TROY TWP LUCKEY TROY TWP NORTH TROY TWP SOUTH WASHINGTON TWP WASHINGTON TWP TONTOGANY WEBSTER TWP WESTON TWP WESTON VILL WESTON TWP WILLOW All AH Wyandot All All Sec. 3521.016. The sixth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Belmont All All C Carroll All All D Columbiana All All E Guernsey All All F Harrison All All G Jefferson All All H Mahoning BEAVER 1 BEAVER 2 BEAVER 3 BEAVER 4 BEAVER 5 BEAVER 6 BEAVER 7 BELOIT 1 BERLIN 1 BERLIN 2 COITSVILLE 01 All I Mahoning COITSVILLE 02 390998108001006 390998109001000 390998109001001 390998109001002 390998109001003 390998109001004 390998109001005 390998109001006 390998109001007 390998109001008 390998109001009 390998109001010 390998109001011 390998109001012 390998109001013 390998109001014 390998109001015 390998109001016 390998109001020 390998109001021 390998109001022 390998109001028 390998109001029 390998109001030 390998109001043 390998109001044 390998109002017 390998109002018 390998109002019 390998109002020 J Mahoning CRAIG BEACH 1 ELLSWORTH 1 ELLSWORTH 2 GOSHEN 1 GOSHEN 2 GOSHEN 3 GREEN 1 GREEN 2 GREEN 3 JACKSON 1 JACKSON 2 LOWELLVILLE 1 LOWELLVILLE 2 MILTON 1 MILTON 2 NEW MIDDLETOWN 1 NEW MIDDLETOWN 2 POLAND 1 POLAND 10 POLAND 11 POLAND 12 POLAND 13 POLAND 2 POLAND 3 POLAND 4 POLAND 5 POLAND 6 POLAND 7 POLAND 8 POLAND 9 POLAND VILLAGE 1 POLAND VILLAGE 2 POLAND VILLAGE 3 SEBRING 1 SEBRING 2 SEBRING 3 SMITH 1 SMITH 2 SMITH 3 SMITH 4 SPRINGFIELD 1 SPRINGFIELD 2 SPRINGFIELD 3 SPRINGFIELD 4 SPRINGFIELD 5 SPRINGFIELD 6 STRUTHERS 1A STRUTHERS 1B STRUTHERS 1C STRUTHERS 2A STRUTHERS 2B STRUTHERS 2C STRUTHERS 3A STRUTHERS 3B STRUTHERS 3C STRUTHERS 4A STRUTHERS 4B STRUTHERS 4C WASHINGTONVILLE 1 YOUNGSTOWN 7D All K Mahoning YOUNGSTOWN 7G 390998013002017 390998013003012 390998014001002 390998014001003 390998014001004 390998014001007 390998014001008 390998014001009 390998014001010 390998014001011 390998014001013 390998014001014 390998014001015 390998014003000 390998014003001 390998014003002 390998014003003 390998014003004 390998014003007 390998014003008 390998014003011 L Monroe All All M Portage All All N Stark ALLIANCE 1-A ALLIANCE 1-B ALLIANCE 1-C ALLIANCE 1-D ALLIANCE 2-A ALLIANCE 2-B ALLIANCE 2-C ALLIANCE 3-A ALLIANCE 3-B ALLIANCE 3-C ALLIANCE 4-A ALLIANCE 4-B ALLIANCE 4-C ALLIANCE 4-D ALLIANCE 4-E ALLIANCE 4-F BETHLEHEM TWP 1 BETHLEHEM TWP 2 BETHLEHEM TWP 3 BETHLEHEM TWP 4 All O Stark CANTON TWP 1 391517132012006 391517132012016 391517132012018 391517132012021 391517132012022 391517132012029 391517132012030 391517132012037 391517132012042 391517132012043 391517132012044 391517132012045 391517132012047 391517132021022 391517132021023 391517132021024 391517132021051 391517132021052 391517132021053 391517132021054 391517132021055 P Stark CANTON TWP 2 CANTON TWP 4 CANTON TWP 5 All Q Stark CANTON TWP 6 391517021003124 391517021003125 391517023002041 391517023002042 391517023002043 391517023002045 391517023002046 391517131002002 391517131002003 391517131002004 391517131002005 391517131002006 391517131002007 391517131002008 391517131002009 391517131002010 391517131002024 391517131002025 391517131002026 391517131003037 391517131003038 391517131003040 391517131003041 391517131003042 391517131003043 391517131003045 391517131003046 391517131003047 391517131003050 391517131003053 391517131003054 391517131005048 391517131005049 391517131005050 391517131005052 391517132014000 391517132014001 391517132014002 391517132014005 R Stark CANTON TWP 7 LAKE TWP 1 LAKE TWP 10 LAKE TWP 11 LAKE TWP 12 LAKE TWP 13 LAKE TWP 14 LAKE TWP 15 LAKE TWP 16 LAKE TWP 17 LAKE TWP 18 LAKE TWP 19 LAKE TWP 2 LAKE TWP 20 LAKE TWP 21 LAKE TWP 3 LAKE TWP 4 LAKE TWP 5 LAKE TWP 6 LAKE TWP 7 LAKE TWP 8 LAKE TWP 9 LAKE TWP A LAKE TWP B LEXINGTON TWP 1 LEXINGTON TWP 2 LEXINGTON TWP 3 LEXINGTON TWP 4 LOUISVILLE A LOUISVILLE B LOUISVILLE C LOUISVILLE D LOUISVILLE E LOUISVILLE F LOUISVILLE G MARLBORO TWP 1 MARLBORO TWP 2 MARLBORO TWP 3 All S Stark MASSILLON 5-B 391517141001043 391517141002002 391517141002003 391517141002010 391517141002018 391517141002020 391517141002021 391517141002024 391517141002025 391517144002034 391517144002035 391517144002036 391517144002037 391517144002038 391517144002039 391517144002040 391517144002042 391517144002044 391517146002010 391517146002011 391517146002012 391517146002013 391517146002014 391517146002016 391517146002017 391517146002018 391517146002019 391517146002020 391517146002021 391517146002023 391517146002024 391517146002026 391517146002035 391517146002072 391517146002078 391517147013036 391517147013037 391517147013041 391517147013046 391517147021000 391517147021005 391517148022049 T Stark NAVARRE A NIMISHILLEN TWP 1 NIMISHILLEN TWP 2 NIMISHILLEN TWP 3 NIMISHILLEN TWP 4 NIMISHILLEN TWP 5 NIMISHILLEN TWP 6 NIMISHILLEN TWP 7 OSNABURG TWP 1 OSNABURG TWP 2 All U Stark OSNABURG TWP 3 391517124002083 391517124002084 391517124002085 391517124002086 391517124002087 391517124002100 391517125001062 391517130003000 391517130003001 391517131001003 391517131001004 391517131001005 391517131001006 391517131001007 391517131001008 391517131001009 391517131001047 391517131005000 391517131005001 391517131005002 391517131005003 391517131005004 391517131005005 391517131005006 391517131005007 391517131005029 391517131005037 391517131005039 391517131005040 391517131005041 391517131005047 391517131005051 V Stark OSNABURG TWP A PARIS TWP 1 PARIS TWP 2 PARIS TWP 3 PARIS TWP A All W Stark PERRY TWP 4 391517144002041 391517144002043 391517144002045 391517146002022 391517146002025 391517146002045 391517146002046 391517146002047 391517146002048 391517146002049 391517146002075 391517146002076 391517146002077 391517146002079 391517146002080 X Stark PIKE TWP 1 PIKE TWP 2 PIKE TWP 3 All Y Stark PLAIN TWP 23 391517124002006 391517124002008 391517124002024 391517124002025 391517124002026 391517124002027 391517124002028 391517124002029 391517124002030 391517124002035 391517124002037 391517124002042 391517124002043 391517124002044 391517124002045 391517124002046 391517124002047 391517124002050 391517124002064 391517124002067 Z Stark SANDY TWP 1 SANDY TWP 2 SUGARCREEK TWP 1 SUGARCREEK TWP 2 SUGARCREEK TWP A SUGARCREEK TWP B SUGARCREEK TWP C All AA Stark TUSCARAWAS TWP 2 391517147012021 391517147012022 391517147012027 391517147012028 391517147012029 391517147012033 391517147012034 391517147012040 391517147012041 391517147012042 391517147012043 391517147012044 391517147012045 391517147012046 391517147012047 391517147014003 391517147014006 391517147014007 391517147014020 391517147014021 391517147014022 391517147014023 391517147014024 391517147023009 391517147023010 391517147023011 391517147023012 391517147023013 391517147023014 391517147023015 391517147023016 391517147023018 391517147023019 391517147023020 391517147023021 391517147023022 391517147023023 391517147023024 391517147023025 391517147023026 391517147023027 391517147023028 391517147023029 391517147023031 391517147023032 391517147023033 391517147023034 391517147023035 AB Stark TUSCARAWAS TWP 3 TUSCARAWAS TWP 4 WASHINGTON TWP 1 WASHINGTON TWP 2 WASHINGTON TWP 3 All AC Tuscarawas BOLIVAR VILLAGE CLAY TWP DENNISON VILLAGE 1 DENNISON VILLAGE 2 DOVER CORP 1A DOVER CORP 1B DOVER CORP 1C DOVER CORP 2A DOVER CORP 2B DOVER CORP 2C DOVER CORP 3A DOVER CORP 3B DOVER CORP 3C DOVER CORP 4A DOVER CORP 4B DOVER CORP 4C DOVER TWP 1 DOVER TWP 2 DOVER TWP 3 DOVER TWP 4 & PARRAL FAIRFIELD TWP FRANKLIN TWP GNADENHUTTEN GOSHEN TWP & ROSWELL GOSHEN TWP 2 GOSHEN TWP 3 & BARNHILL All AD Tuscarawas GOSHEN TWP 4 391570205003118 391570205003119 391570205003120 391570205003121 391570208011000 391570208011001 391570208011002 391570208011005 391570208011012 391570208011013 391570208011014 391570208011057 391570208011061 391570208011062 391570208021002 391570208021004 391570210001027 391570210001033 391570210001034 391570210001035 391570210001036 391570210001037 391570210001038 391570210004012 391570210004014 391570210004030 391570210004040 391570210004041 391570215011000 391570215011001 391570215011003 391570215011009 391570215011010 391570215011012 391570215011015 391570215011017 391570215011018 391570215011022 391570215011046 391570215011047 391570215011048 391570215011049 391570215012005 391570215012008 391570215012013 391570215012015 391570215012017 391570215012018 391570215012019 391570215012054 391570215012055 391570215012059 391570215012060 391570215012067 391570215012069 391570215012070 391570215012071 391570215021007 391570215021008 391570215021010 391570215021012 391570215021014 391570215021015 391570215022000 391570215022001 391570215022002 391570215022003 391570215022004 391570215022005 391570215022006 391570215022007 391570215022008 391570215022011 391570215022012 391570215022013 391570215031000 391570215031001 391570215031002 391570215031003 AE Tuscarawas LAWRENCE TWP 1 LAWRENCE TWP 2 LAWRENCE TWP 3 LAWRENCE TWP 4 MIDVALE VILLAGE MILL TWP MINERAL CITY NEW PHILADELPHIA 1A NEW PHILADELPHIA 1B NEW PHILADELPHIA 1C NEW PHILADELPHIA 1D NEW PHILADELPHIA 2A NEW PHILADELPHIA 2B NEW PHILADELPHIA 2C NEW PHILADELPHIA 2D NEW PHILADELPHIA 3A NEW PHILADELPHIA 3B NEW PHILADELPHIA 3C NEW PHILADELPHIA 3D All AF Tuscarawas NEW PHILADELPHIA 4C 391570215011011 391570215012014 391570215012016 391570215012021 391570215012022 391570215012027 391570215012028 391570215012029 391570215012030 391570215012031 391570215012032 391570215012033 391570215012034 AG Tuscarawas NEW PHILADELPHIA 4D NEWCOMERSTOWN 1 NEWCOMERSTOWN 2 NEWCOMERSTOWN 3 OXFORD TWP PERRY TWP PORT WASHINGTON RUSH TWP SALEM TWP SANDY TWP EAST SANDY TWP WEST STRASBURG VILLAGE 1 STRASBURG VILLAGE 2 TUSCARAWAS VILLAGE UHRICHSVILLE WARD 1 UHRICHSVILLE WARD 2 UHRICHSVILLE WARD 3 UHRICHSVILLE WARD 4 UNION TWP WARREN TWP WARWICK TWP EAST WARWICK TWP WEST WASHINGTON TWP WAYNE TWP & DUNDEE All AH Washington Fearing Independence Lawrence Liberty Ludlow Marietta 1A Marietta 1B All AI Washington Marietta 2A 391670205002000 391670205002003 391670205002005 391670205002006 391670205002008 391670205002024 391670208003011 391670208003012 391670208003013 AJ Washington Marietta 2B Marietta 3A Marietta 3B Marietta 3C Marietta 4C Matamoras / Grandview MTTA East A MTTA East B MTTA East C MTTA East D All AK Washington MUSK East C 391670209001018 391670209002002 AL Washington Newport All Sec. 3521.017. The seventh congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Cuyahoga BAY VILLAGE-01-A BAY VILLAGE-01-B BAY VILLAGE-01-C BAY VILLAGE-02-A BAY VILLAGE-02-B BAY VILLAGE-02-C BAY VILLAGE-03-A BAY VILLAGE-03-B BAY VILLAGE-03-C BAY VILLAGE-04-A BAY VILLAGE-04-B BAY VILLAGE-04-C BEACHWOOD-00-A BEACHWOOD-00-B BEACHWOOD-00-C All C Cuyahoga BEACHWOOD-00-D 390351311051000 390351311051001 390351311051002 390351311051003 390351311051004 390351311051005 390351311051006 390351311051007 390351311051008 390351311051009 390351311051010 390351311051011 390351311052008 390351311052010 390351311052011 390351311052012 390351311052013 390351311052014 D Cuyahoga BEACHWOOD-00-E BEACHWOOD-00-F BEACHWOOD-00-G BEACHWOOD-00-H BEACHWOOD-00-I BEDFORD HEIGHTS-01-A BEDFORD HEIGHTS-01-B BEDFORD HEIGHTS-01-C BEDFORD HEIGHTS-02-A BEDFORD HEIGHTS-02-B BEDFORD HEIGHTS-03-A BEDFORD HEIGHTS-03-B BEDFORD HEIGHTS-04-A BEDFORD HEIGHTS-04-B BEDFORD-01-A BEDFORD-01-B BEDFORD-02-A BEDFORD-02-B BEDFORD-03-A BEDFORD-03-B BEDFORD-04-A BEDFORD-04-B BEDFORD-05-A BEDFORD-06-A BENTLEYVILLE-00-A BEREA-01-A BEREA-01-B BEREA-02-A BEREA-02-B BEREA-02-C BEREA-03-A BEREA-03-B BEREA-03-C BEREA-04-A BEREA-04-B BEREA-05-A BEREA-05-B BEREA-05-C BRECKSVILLE-00-A BRECKSVILLE-00-B BRECKSVILLE-00-C BRECKSVILLE-00-D BRECKSVILLE-00-E BRECKSVILLE-00-F BRECKSVILLE-00-G BRECKSVILLE-00-H BRECKSVILLE-00-I BRECKSVILLE-00-J BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-01-A BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-01-B BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-01-C BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-02-A BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-02-B BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-02-C BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-A BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-B BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-C BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-D BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-A BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-B BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-C BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-D CHAGRIN FALLS TWP-00-A CHAGRIN FALLS-00-A CHAGRIN FALLS-00-B CHAGRIN FALLS-00-C FAIRVIEW PARK-01-A FAIRVIEW PARK-01-B FAIRVIEW PARK-01-C FAIRVIEW PARK-02-A FAIRVIEW PARK-02-B FAIRVIEW PARK-02-C FAIRVIEW PARK-03-A FAIRVIEW PARK-03-B FAIRVIEW PARK-03-C FAIRVIEW PARK-04-A FAIRVIEW PARK-04-B FAIRVIEW PARK-05-A FAIRVIEW PARK-05-B GLENWILLOW-01-A GLENWILLOW-02-A GLENWILLOW-03-A HUNTING VALLEY-00-A INDEPENDENCE-00-A INDEPENDENCE-00-B INDEPENDENCE-00-C INDEPENDENCE-00-D INDEPENDENCE-00-E LAKEWOOD-01-A LAKEWOOD-01-B LAKEWOOD-01-C LAKEWOOD-01-D LAKEWOOD-01-E LAKEWOOD-01-F LAKEWOOD-01-G LAKEWOOD-01-H LAKEWOOD-01-I LAKEWOOD-02-A LAKEWOOD-02-B LAKEWOOD-02-C LAKEWOOD-02-D LAKEWOOD-02-E LAKEWOOD-02-F LAKEWOOD-02-G LAKEWOOD-02-H LAKEWOOD-02-I LAKEWOOD-03-A LAKEWOOD-03-B LAKEWOOD-03-C LAKEWOOD-03-D LAKEWOOD-03-E LAKEWOOD-03-F LAKEWOOD-03-G LAKEWOOD-03-H LAKEWOOD-03-I LAKEWOOD-04-A LAKEWOOD-04-B LAKEWOOD-04-C LAKEWOOD-04-D LAKEWOOD-04-E LAKEWOOD-04-F LAKEWOOD-04-G LAKEWOOD-04-H LAKEWOOD-04-I LAKEWOOD-04-J LYNDHURST-01-A LYNDHURST-01-B LYNDHURST-01-C LYNDHURST-02-A LYNDHURST-02-B LYNDHURST-03-A LYNDHURST-03-B LYNDHURST-03-C LYNDHURST-04-A LYNDHURST-04-B LYNDHURST-04-C MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-A MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-B MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-C MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-D MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-E MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-F MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-G MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-H MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-I MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-J MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-K MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-L MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-M MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-01-A MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-01-B MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-01-C MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-02-A MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-02-B MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-02-C MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-03-A MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-03-B MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-03-C MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-04-A MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-04-B MORELAND HILLS-00-A MORELAND HILLS-00-B MORELAND HILLS-00-C NORTH OLMSTEAD-03-B NORTH OLMSTED-01-A NORTH OLMSTED-01-B NORTH OLMSTED-01-C NORTH OLMSTED-01-D NORTH OLMSTED-01-E NORTH OLMSTED-02-A NORTH OLMSTED-02-B NORTH OLMSTED-02-C NORTH OLMSTED-02-D NORTH OLMSTED-02-E NORTH OLMSTED-03-A NORTH OLMSTED-03-C NORTH OLMSTED-03-D NORTH OLMSTED-03-E NORTH OLMSTED-03-F NORTH OLMSTED-04-A NORTH OLMSTED-04-B NORTH OLMSTED-04-C NORTH OLMSTED-04-D NORTH OLMSTED-04-E NORTH ROYALTON-01-A NORTH ROYALTON-01-B NORTH ROYALTON-01-C NORTH ROYALTON-02-A NORTH ROYALTON-02-B NORTH ROYALTON-02-C NORTH ROYALTON-02-D NORTH ROYALTON-03-A NORTH ROYALTON-03-B NORTH ROYALTON-03-C NORTH ROYALTON-03-D NORTH ROYALTON-04-A NORTH ROYALTON-04-B NORTH ROYALTON-04-C NORTH ROYALTON-05-A NORTH ROYALTON-05-B NORTH ROYALTON-05-C NORTH ROYALTON-05-D NORTH ROYALTON-06-A NORTH ROYALTON-06-B NORTH ROYALTON-06-C NORTH ROYALTON-06-D OAKWOOD-01-A OAKWOOD-02-A OAKWOOD-03-A OAKWOOD-04-A OAKWOOD-05-A OLMSTED FALLS-01-A OLMSTED FALLS-01-B OLMSTED FALLS-02-A OLMSTED FALLS-02-B OLMSTED FALLS-03-A OLMSTED FALLS-03-B OLMSTED FALLS-04-A OLMSTED FALLS-04-B OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-A OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-B OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-C OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-D OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-E OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-F OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-G OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-H OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-I ORANGE-00-A ORANGE-00-B ORANGE-00-C PEPPER PIKE-00-A PEPPER PIKE-00-B PEPPER PIKE-00-C PEPPER PIKE-00-D PEPPER PIKE-00-E ROCKY RIVER-01-A ROCKY RIVER-01-B ROCKY RIVER-01-C ROCKY RIVER-01-D ROCKY RIVER-02-A ROCKY RIVER-02-B ROCKY RIVER-02-C ROCKY RIVER-02-D ROCKY RIVER-03-A ROCKY RIVER-03-B ROCKY RIVER-03-C ROCKY RIVER-03-D ROCKY RIVER-04-A ROCKY RIVER-04-B ROCKY RIVER-04-C ROCKY RIVER-04-D SOLON-01-A SOLON-01-B SOLON-02-A SOLON-02-B SOLON-03-A SOLON-03-B SOLON-04-A SOLON-04-B SOLON-04-C SOLON-05-A SOLON-05-B SOLON-06-A SOLON-06-B SOLON-07-A SOLON-07-B All E Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-02-C 390351851031007 390351851031009 F Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-02-D SOUTH EUCLID-03-D All G Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-04-D 390351852033000 390351852033002 H Cuyahoga STRONGSVILLE-01-A STRONGSVILLE-01-B STRONGSVILLE-01-C STRONGSVILLE-01-D STRONGSVILLE-01-E STRONGSVILLE-01-F STRONGSVILLE-01-G STRONGSVILLE-02-A STRONGSVILLE-02-B STRONGSVILLE-02-C STRONGSVILLE-02-D STRONGSVILLE-02-E STRONGSVILLE-02-F STRONGSVILLE-02-G STRONGSVILLE-02-H STRONGSVILLE-02-I STRONGSVILLE-03-A STRONGSVILLE-03-B STRONGSVILLE-03-C STRONGSVILLE-03-D STRONGSVILLE-03-E STRONGSVILLE-03-F STRONGSVILLE-03-G STRONGSVILLE-04-A STRONGSVILLE-04-B STRONGSVILLE-04-C STRONGSVILLE-04-D STRONGSVILLE-04-E STRONGSVILLE-04-F STRONGSVILLE-04-G VALLEY VIEW-00-A VALLEY VIEW-00-B WALTON HILLS-00-A WALTON HILLS-00-B WESTLAKE-01-A WESTLAKE-01-B WESTLAKE-01-C WESTLAKE-01-D WESTLAKE-02-A WESTLAKE-02-B WESTLAKE-02-C WESTLAKE-02-D WESTLAKE-03-A WESTLAKE-03-B WESTLAKE-03-C WESTLAKE-03-D WESTLAKE-04-A WESTLAKE-04-B WESTLAKE-04-C WESTLAKE-04-D WESTLAKE-05-A WESTLAKE-05-B WESTLAKE-05-C WESTLAKE-05-D WESTLAKE-06-A WESTLAKE-06-B WESTLAKE-06-C WESTLAKE-06-D WOODMERE-00-A All I Lorain AVON CITY 1-A AVON CITY 1-B AVON CITY 1-C AVON CITY 1-D AVON CITY 1-E AVON CITY 2-A AVON CITY 2-B AVON CITY 2-C AVON CITY 3-A AVON CITY 3-B AVON CITY 3-C AVON CITY 4-A AVON CITY 4-B AVON CITY 4-C AVON LAKE CITY 1-A AVON LAKE CITY 1-B AVON LAKE CITY 1-C AVON LAKE CITY 1-D AVON LAKE CITY 2-A AVON LAKE CITY 2-B AVON LAKE CITY 2-C AVON LAKE CITY 2-D AVON LAKE CITY 3-A AVON LAKE CITY 3-B AVON LAKE CITY 3-C All J Lorain AVON LAKE CITY 4-A 390930104001004 390930104001006 390930104001007 390930104001008 390930104001009 390930104001010 390930104001013 390930104001014 390930104001015 390930104001016 390930104001017 390930104001022 390930104001023 390930104001024 390930104001025 390930104001026 390930104001027 390930104002000 390930104002001 390930104002002 390930104002003 K Lorain AVON LAKE CITY 4-B AVON LAKE CITY 4-C AVON LAKE CITY 4-D ELYRIA CITY 1-A ELYRIA CITY 1-B ELYRIA CITY 1-C ELYRIA CITY 1-D ELYRIA CITY 2-A ELYRIA CITY 2-B ELYRIA CITY 2-C ELYRIA CITY 2-D ELYRIA CITY 3-B ELYRIA CITY 4-A ELYRIA CITY 4-B ELYRIA CITY 4-C ELYRIA CITY 4-D ELYRIA CITY 4-E All L Lorain ELYRIA CITY 5-A 390930976001000 390930976001001 390930976001006 390930976001010 390930976001011 390930976003000 390930976003001 390930976003002 390930976003003 390930976003004 390930976003005 390930976003006 390930976003007 390930976004000 390930976004001 390930976004002 390930976004003 390930976004005 390930976004006 390930976004007 390930976004008 390930976004009 390930976004010 390930976004011 390930976004012 390930976004013 390930976004014 390930976004015 390930976004016 390930976004023 390930976004025 390930976004026 390930976004027 390930976004029 390930976004042 M Lorain ELYRIA CITY 6-A ELYRIA CITY 6-B ELYRIA CITY 6-D ELYRIA CITY 7-A ELYRIA CITY 7-B ELYRIA CITY 7-C ELYRIA CITY 7-D ELYRIA CITY 7-E ELYRIA TWP #1 ELYRIA TWP #2 N. RIDGEVILLE 1-A N. RIDGEVILLE 1-B N. RIDGEVILLE 1-C N. RIDGEVILLE 1-D N. RIDGEVILLE 1-E N. RIDGEVILLE 2-A N. RIDGEVILLE 2-B N. RIDGEVILLE 2-C N. RIDGEVILLE 2-D N. RIDGEVILLE 3-A N. RIDGEVILLE 3-B N. RIDGEVILLE 3-C N. RIDGEVILLE 3-D N. RIDGEVILLE 3-E N. RIDGEVILLE 3-F N. RIDGEVILLE 3-G N. RIDGEVILLE 3-H N. RIDGEVILLE 4-A N. RIDGEVILLE 4-B N. RIDGEVILLE 4-C N. RIDGEVILLE 4-D N. RIDGEVILLE 4-E N. RIDGEVILLE 4-F All N Medina All All Sec. 3521.018. The eighth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Butler All All C Darke All All D Miami CONCORD EAST CONCORD NORTH CONCORD SOUTH CONCORD SOUTH EAST CONCORD WEST LAURA LUDLOW CENTRAL All E Miami MONROE EAST CENTRAL 391093501014001 391093501014002 391093501014003 391093501014005 391093501014006 391093501014007 391093501014008 391093501014009 391093501014010 391093501014011 391093501014013 391093501014014 391093501014015 391093501014020 391093501014022 391093501021040 391093550011017 391093550011020 391093550022029 391093550022030 391093550022035 391093550022042 391093550022043 F Miami MONROE NORTH EAST MONROE SOUTH MONROE SOUTH EAST MONROE WEST NEWTON EAST NEWTON WEST PLEASANT HILL POTSDAM STAUNTON NORTH STAUNTON SOUTH TIPP CITY A TIPP CITY B TIPP CITY C All G Miami TIPP CITY D 391093550011023 391093550011026 391093550012006 391093550012007 391093550012010 391093550012011 391093550012012 391093550012013 391093550012014 391093550012015 391093550013004 391093550013005 391093550014000 391093550014001 391093550014004 H Miami TIPP CITY E TIPP CITY F All I Miami TIPP CITY G 391093501013000 391093501013004 391093550013007 391093550013011 391093550013012 391093550021028 391093550021030 391093550022008 391093550022009 391093550022019 391093550022020 391093550022021 391093550022028 391093550022031 391093550022032 391093550022033 391093550022034 391093550022038 391093550022039 J Miami TROY 1-A TROY 1-B TROY 1-C TROY 1-D TROY 2-A TROY 2-B TROY 2-C TROY 3-A TROY 3-B TROY 3-C TROY 3-D TROY 4-A TROY 4-B TROY 4-C TROY 5-A TROY 5-B TROY 5-C TROY 6-A TROY 6-B TROY 6-C TROY 6-D UNION EAST UNION SOUTH CENTRAL WEST MILTON A WEST MILTON B WEST MILTON C All K Preble All All L Warren All All Sec. 3521.019. The ninth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Erie All All C Lorain AMHERST CITY 1-A AMHERST CITY 1-B AMHERST CITY 2-A AMHERST CITY 2-B AMHERST CITY 2-C AMHERST CITY 3-A AMHERST CITY 3-B AMHERST CITY 4-A AMHERST CITY 4-B AMHERST TWP #1 AMHERST TWP #2 AMHERST TWP #3 AMHERST TWP #4 All D Lorain AVON LAKE CITY 4-A 390930104001005 E Lorain BRIGHTON TWP BROWNHELM TWP CARLISLE TWP #1 CARLISLE TWP #2 CARLISLE TWP #3 CARLISLE TWP #4 CARLISLE TWP #5 COLUMBIA TWP #1 COLUMBIA TWP #2 COLUMBIA TWP #3 COLUMBIA TWP #4 EATON TWP #1 EATON TWP #2 EATON TWP #3 ELYRIA CITY 3-A ELYRIA CITY 3-C ELYRIA CITY 3-D ELYRIA CITY 3-E All F Lorain ELYRIA CITY 5-A 390930976001002 390930976001003 390930976001004 390930976001005 390930976001008 390930976001009 390930976002009 390930976004004 390930976004017 390930976004018 390930976004019 390930976004020 390930976004021 390930976004022 390930976004024 390930976004028 390930976004030 390930976004031 390930976004032 390930976004033 390930976004034 390930976004035 390930976004036 390930976004037 390930976004038 390930976004039 390930976004040 390930976004041 G Lorain ELYRIA CITY 5-B ELYRIA CITY 5-C ELYRIA CITY 5-D ELYRIA CITY 6-C GRAFTON TWP #1 GRAFTON TWP #2 GRAFTON VILL #1/#2 GRAFTON VILL #3/#4 HENRIETTA TWP HUNTINGTON TWP LAGRANGE TWP #1 LAGRANGE TWP #2 LAGRANGE VILL LORAIN CITY 1-A LORAIN CITY 1-B LORAIN CITY 1-C LORAIN CITY 1-D LORAIN CITY 1-E LORAIN CITY 2-A LORAIN CITY 2-B LORAIN CITY 2-C LORAIN CITY 2-D LORAIN CITY 2-E LORAIN CITY 2-F LORAIN CITY 3-A LORAIN CITY 3-B LORAIN CITY 3-C LORAIN CITY 3-D LORAIN CITY 3-E LORAIN CITY 4-A LORAIN CITY 4-B LORAIN CITY 4-C LORAIN CITY 4-D LORAIN CITY 4-E LORAIN CITY 4-F LORAIN CITY 5-A LORAIN CITY 5-B LORAIN CITY 5-C LORAIN CITY 5-D LORAIN CITY 6-A LORAIN CITY 6-B LORAIN CITY 6-C LORAIN CITY 6-D LORAIN CITY 7-A LORAIN CITY 7-B LORAIN CITY 7-C LORAIN CITY 7-D LORAIN CITY 7-E LORAIN CITY 8-A LORAIN CITY 8-B LORAIN CITY 8-C LORAIN CITY 8-D LORAIN CITY 8-E LORAIN CITY 8-F NEW RUSSIA TWP OBERLIN CITY #1 OBERLIN CITY #2 OBERLIN CITY #3 OBERLIN CITY #4 OBERLIN CITY #5 OBERLIN CITY #6 OBERLIN CITY #7 OBERLIN CITY #8 PENFIELD TWP PITTSFIELD TWP PRECINCT CAMDEN TWP/KIPTON VILL PRECINCT SHEFFIELD TWP EAST PRECINCT SHEFFIELD TWP NORTH PRECINCT SHEFFIELD TWP WEST ROCHESTER TWP & VILL S AMHERST VILL SHEF. LAKE CITY 1-A SHEF. LAKE CITY 2-A SHEF. LAKE CITY 3-A SHEF. LAKE CITY 4-A SHEFFIELD VILL #1 SHEFFIELD VILL #2 SHEFFIELD VILL #3 VERMILION CITY 1-A VERMILION CITY 3-A/5-A VERMILION CITY 4-A VERMILION CITY 5-B WELLINGTON TWP WELLINGTON VILL NORTH WELLINGTON VILL SOUTH All H Lucas All All I Ottawa All All J Wood LAKE TWP EAST LAKE TWP LATCHA LAKE TWP MILLBURY LAKE TWP NORTH LAKE TWP UNION LAKE TWP WALBRIDGE A LAKE TWP WALBRIDGE B NORTHWOOD A NORTHWOOD B NORTHWOOD D PERRYSBURG A PERRYSBURG B All K Wood PERRYSBURG E 391730204012035 391730204013030 391730204013031 391730204013032 391730204013033 391730204021007 391730204021008 391730204021010 391730204021011 391730204021013 391730204021014 391730204021017 391730205002009 391730205002010 391730205002011 391730205002012 391730205002022 391730205002023 391730205002024 391730205002025 L Wood PERRYSBURG M PERRYSBURG N All M Wood PERRYSBURG O 391730204021000 391730204021001 391730204021002 391730204021003 391730204021004 391730204021005 391730204021018 391730204021022 391730204021023 N Wood PERRYSBURG P PERRYSBURG T PERRYSBURG TWP BELMONT PERRYSBURG TWP ECKEL PERRYSBURG TWP FORD All O Wood PERRYSBURG TWP FT MEIGS 391730204022056 391730206011058 391730206011059 391730206021000 391730206021003 391730206021005 391730206021019 391730206021020 391730206021021 391730206021022 391730206021023 391730206023000 391730206023001 391730206023002 391730206023003 391730206023004 391730206023006 391730206023007 391730206023008 391730206023021 391730206023022 391730206023023 391730206023027 391730206023029 391730206023031 391730206024006 391730206024042 391730207022022 391730207022023 391730207022024 391730207022028 391730207023017 391730207023018 391730207023024 391730207023026 391730207023028 391730207023029 391730207023036 391730212001073 P Wood PERRYSBURG TWP GLENWOOD PERRYSBURG TWP HAMLET PERRYSBURG TWP NORTH PERRYSBURG TWP SOUTH PERRYSBURG U PERRYSBURG V PERRYSBURG W All Q Wood PERRYSBURG X 391730206024001 391730206024002 391730206024005 391730206024007 391730206024008 391730206024009 391730206024010 391730206024012 391730206024013 R Wood PERRYSBURG Y PRBG TWP FALLEN TIMBERS PRBG TWP STARBRIGHT ROSSFORD A ROSSFORD D ROSSFORD F ROSSFORD H ROSSFORD I All Sec. 3521.0110. The tenth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Clark BETH 1 BETH 2 BETH 3 BETH 4 BETH 5 BETH 6 BETH 7 BETH 8 BETH 9 CARL 1 CARL 2 CARL 3 CITY 1 CITY 10 CITY 12 CITY 13 CITY 14 CITY 18 CITY 19 CITY 2 CITY 20 CITY 21 CITY 22 CITY 23 CITY 24 All C Clark CITY 25 390230007001000 390230007001001 390230007001002 390230007001003 390230007001004 390230007001005 390230007001006 390230007001007 390230007001008 390230007001009 390230007001010 390230007001011 390230007001012 390230007002000 390230007002001 390230007002002 390230007002003 390230007002008 390230007002009 390230007002010 390230007002011 390230007002012 390230007002013 390230007002014 390230007002015 390230007002016 390230007002017 390230007002018 390230007002019 390230007002020 390230007002021 390230007002022 390230007003000 390230007003001 390230007003002 390230007003003 390230007003004 390230007003005 390230007003006 390230007003007 390230007003008 390230007003009 390230007003010 390230007003011 390230007003012 390230007003013 390230034003000 390230034003001 D Clark CITY 28 CITY 29 CITY 3 CITY 30 CITY 4 CITY 5 CITY 6 CITY 7 CITY 8 CITY 9 ENON 1 ENON 2 GREE 1 GREE 2 MR-1 MR-2 MR-3 MR-4 MR-5 MR-6 T-3 T-4 T-5 T-6 T-7 T-8 All E Greene All All F Montgomery All All Sec. 3521.0111. The eleventh congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Cuyahoga BEACHWOOD-00-D 390351833004019 390351835011006 390351835011009 C Cuyahoga BRATENAHL-00-A BROOK PARK-01-A BROOK PARK-01-B BROOK PARK-01-C BROOK PARK-02-A BROOK PARK-02-B BROOK PARK-02-C BROOK PARK-03-A BROOK PARK-03-B BROOK PARK-03-C BROOK PARK-04-A BROOK PARK-04-B BROOK PARK-04-C BROOKLYN HEIGHTS-00-A BROOKLYN-00-A BROOKLYN-00-B BROOKLYN-00-C BROOKLYN-00-D BROOKLYN-00-E BROOKLYN-00-F BROOKLYN-00-G BROOKLYN-00-H CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-A CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-B CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-C CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-D CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-E CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-F CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-A CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-B CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-C CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-D CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-E CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-F CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-A CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-B CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-C CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-D CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-E CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-F CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-A CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-B CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-C CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-D CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-E CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-F CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-G CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-H CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-I CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-A CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-B CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-C CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-D CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-E CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-F CLEVELAND-01-A CLEVELAND-01-B CLEVELAND-01-C CLEVELAND-01-D CLEVELAND-01-E CLEVELAND-01-F CLEVELAND-01-G CLEVELAND-01-H CLEVELAND-01-I CLEVELAND-01-J CLEVELAND-01-K CLEVELAND-01-L CLEVELAND-01-M CLEVELAND-01-N CLEVELAND-01-O CLEVELAND-01-P CLEVELAND-01-Q CLEVELAND-01-R CLEVELAND-01-S CLEVELAND-01-T CLEVELAND-02-A CLEVELAND-02-B CLEVELAND-02-C CLEVELAND-02-D CLEVELAND-02-E CLEVELAND-02-F CLEVELAND-02-G CLEVELAND-02-H CLEVELAND-02-I CLEVELAND-02-J CLEVELAND-02-K CLEVELAND-02-L CLEVELAND-02-M CLEVELAND-02-N CLEVELAND-02-O CLEVELAND-02-P CLEVELAND-02-Q CLEVELAND-02-R CLEVELAND-02-S CLEVELAND-02-T CLEVELAND-02-U CLEVELAND-02-V CLEVELAND-02-W CLEVELAND-03-A CLEVELAND-03-B CLEVELAND-03-C CLEVELAND-03-D CLEVELAND-03-E CLEVELAND-03-F CLEVELAND-03-G CLEVELAND-03-H CLEVELAND-03-I CLEVELAND-03-J CLEVELAND-03-K CLEVELAND-03-L CLEVELAND-03-M CLEVELAND-03-N CLEVELAND-03-O CLEVELAND-03-P CLEVELAND-03-Q CLEVELAND-03-R CLEVELAND-03-S CLEVELAND-04-A CLEVELAND-04-B CLEVELAND-04-C CLEVELAND-04-D CLEVELAND-04-E CLEVELAND-04-F CLEVELAND-04-G CLEVELAND-04-H CLEVELAND-04-I CLEVELAND-04-J CLEVELAND-04-K CLEVELAND-04-L CLEVELAND-04-M CLEVELAND-04-N CLEVELAND-04-O CLEVELAND-04-P CLEVELAND-04-Q CLEVELAND-04-R CLEVELAND-04-S CLEVELAND-04-T CLEVELAND-04-U CLEVELAND-05-A CLEVELAND-05-B CLEVELAND-05-C CLEVELAND-05-D CLEVELAND-05-E CLEVELAND-05-F CLEVELAND-05-G CLEVELAND-05-H CLEVELAND-05-I CLEVELAND-05-J CLEVELAND-05-K CLEVELAND-05-L CLEVELAND-05-M CLEVELAND-05-N CLEVELAND-05-O CLEVELAND-05-P CLEVELAND-05-Q CLEVELAND-05-R CLEVELAND-05-S CLEVELAND-06-A CLEVELAND-06-B CLEVELAND-06-C CLEVELAND-06-D CLEVELAND-06-E CLEVELAND-06-F CLEVELAND-06-G CLEVELAND-06-H CLEVELAND-06-I CLEVELAND-06-J CLEVELAND-06-K CLEVELAND-06-L CLEVELAND-06-M CLEVELAND-06-N CLEVELAND-06-O CLEVELAND-06-P CLEVELAND-06-Q CLEVELAND-06-R CLEVELAND-06-S CLEVELAND-06-T CLEVELAND-06-U CLEVELAND-07-A CLEVELAND-07-B CLEVELAND-07-C CLEVELAND-07-D CLEVELAND-07-E CLEVELAND-07-F CLEVELAND-07-G CLEVELAND-07-H CLEVELAND-07-I CLEVELAND-07-J CLEVELAND-07-K CLEVELAND-07-L CLEVELAND-07-M CLEVELAND-07-N CLEVELAND-07-O CLEVELAND-07-P CLEVELAND-07-Q CLEVELAND-07-R CLEVELAND-07-S CLEVELAND-07-T CLEVELAND-07-U CLEVELAND-07-V CLEVELAND-07-W CLEVELAND-08-A CLEVELAND-08-B CLEVELAND-08-C CLEVELAND-08-D CLEVELAND-08-E CLEVELAND-08-F CLEVELAND-08-G CLEVELAND-08-H CLEVELAND-08-I CLEVELAND-08-J CLEVELAND-08-K CLEVELAND-08-L CLEVELAND-08-M CLEVELAND-08-N CLEVELAND-08-O CLEVELAND-08-P CLEVELAND-08-Q CLEVELAND-08-R CLEVELAND-09-A CLEVELAND-09-B CLEVELAND-09-C CLEVELAND-09-D CLEVELAND-09-E CLEVELAND-09-F CLEVELAND-09-G CLEVELAND-09-H CLEVELAND-09-I CLEVELAND-09-J CLEVELAND-09-K CLEVELAND-09-L CLEVELAND-09-M CLEVELAND-09-N CLEVELAND-09-O CLEVELAND-09-P CLEVELAND-09-Q CLEVELAND-09-R CLEVELAND-09-S CLEVELAND-09-T CLEVELAND-09-U CLEVELAND-09-V CLEVELAND-09-W CLEVELAND-09-X CLEVELAND-10-A CLEVELAND-10-B CLEVELAND-10-C CLEVELAND-10-D CLEVELAND-10-E CLEVELAND-10-F CLEVELAND-10-G CLEVELAND-10-H CLEVELAND-10-I CLEVELAND-10-J CLEVELAND-10-K CLEVELAND-10-L CLEVELAND-10-M CLEVELAND-10-N CLEVELAND-10-O CLEVELAND-10-P CLEVELAND-10-Q CLEVELAND-10-R CLEVELAND-10-S CLEVELAND-10-T CLEVELAND-10-U CLEVELAND-10-V CLEVELAND-11-A CLEVELAND-11-B CLEVELAND-11-C CLEVELAND-11-D CLEVELAND-11-E CLEVELAND-11-F CLEVELAND-11-G CLEVELAND-11-H CLEVELAND-11-I CLEVELAND-11-J CLEVELAND-11-K CLEVELAND-11-L CLEVELAND-11-M CLEVELAND-11-N CLEVELAND-11-O CLEVELAND-11-P CLEVELAND-12-A CLEVELAND-12-B CLEVELAND-12-C CLEVELAND-12-D CLEVELAND-12-E CLEVELAND-12-F CLEVELAND-12-G CLEVELAND-12-H CLEVELAND-12-I CLEVELAND-12-J CLEVELAND-12-K CLEVELAND-12-L CLEVELAND-12-M CLEVELAND-12-N CLEVELAND-12-O CLEVELAND-12-P CLEVELAND-12-Q CLEVELAND-12-R CLEVELAND-12-S CLEVELAND-13-A CLEVELAND-13-B CLEVELAND-13-C CLEVELAND-13-D CLEVELAND-13-E CLEVELAND-13-F CLEVELAND-13-G CLEVELAND-13-H CLEVELAND-13-I CLEVELAND-13-J CLEVELAND-13-K CLEVELAND-13-L CLEVELAND-13-M CLEVELAND-13-N CLEVELAND-13-O CLEVELAND-13-P CLEVELAND-13-Q CLEVELAND-14-A CLEVELAND-14-B CLEVELAND-14-C CLEVELAND-14-D CLEVELAND-14-E CLEVELAND-14-F CLEVELAND-14-G CLEVELAND-14-H CLEVELAND-14-I CLEVELAND-14-J CLEVELAND-14-K CLEVELAND-14-L CLEVELAND-14-M CLEVELAND-14-N CLEVELAND-14-O CLEVELAND-14-P CLEVELAND-15-A CLEVELAND-15-B CLEVELAND-15-C CLEVELAND-15-D CLEVELAND-15-E CLEVELAND-15-F CLEVELAND-15-G CLEVELAND-15-H CLEVELAND-15-I CLEVELAND-15-J CLEVELAND-15-K CLEVELAND-15-L CLEVELAND-15-M CLEVELAND-15-N CLEVELAND-15-O CLEVELAND-15-P CLEVELAND-15-Q CLEVELAND-15-R CLEVELAND-16-A CLEVELAND-16-B CLEVELAND-16-C CLEVELAND-16-D CLEVELAND-16-E CLEVELAND-16-F CLEVELAND-16-G CLEVELAND-16-H CLEVELAND-16-I CLEVELAND-16-J CLEVELAND-16-K CLEVELAND-16-L CLEVELAND-16-M CLEVELAND-16-N CLEVELAND-16-O CLEVELAND-16-P CLEVELAND-16-Q CLEVELAND-17-A CLEVELAND-17-B CLEVELAND-17-C CLEVELAND-17-D CLEVELAND-17-E CLEVELAND-17-F CLEVELAND-17-G CLEVELAND-17-H CLEVELAND-17-I CLEVELAND-17-J CLEVELAND-17-K CLEVELAND-17-L CLEVELAND-17-M CLEVELAND-17-N CLEVELAND-17-O CLEVELAND-17-P CLEVELAND-17-Q CLEVELAND-17-R CLEVELAND-17-S CUYAHOGA HEIGHTS-00-A EAST CLEVELAND-02-A EAST CLEVELAND-02-B EAST CLEVELAND-02-C EAST CLEVELAND-02-D EAST CLEVELAND-03-A EAST CLEVELAND-03-B EAST CLEVELAND-03-C EAST CLEVELAND-03-D EAST CLEVELAND-03-E EAST CLEVELAND-04-A EAST CLEVELAND-04-B EAST CLEVELAND-04-C EAST CLEVELAND-04-D EAST CLEVELAND-04-E EAST CLEVELAND-04-F EUCLID-01-A EUCLID-01-B EUCLID-01-C EUCLID-01-D EUCLID-01-E EUCLID-02-A EUCLID-02-B EUCLID-02-C EUCLID-02-D EUCLID-03-A EUCLID-03-B EUCLID-03-C EUCLID-03-D EUCLID-03-E EUCLID-04-A EUCLID-04-B EUCLID-04-C EUCLID-04-D EUCLID-04-E EUCLID-05-A EUCLID-05-B EUCLID-05-C EUCLID-05-D EUCLID-05-E EUCLID-06-A EUCLID-06-B EUCLID-06-C EUCLID-06-D EUCLID-06-E EUCLID-07-A EUCLID-07-B EUCLID-07-C EUCLID-07-D EUCLID-07-E EUCLID-08-A EUCLID-08-B EUCLID-08-C EUCLID-08-D EUCLID-08-E GARFIELD HEIGHTS-01-A GARFIELD HEIGHTS-01-B GARFIELD HEIGHTS-01-C GARFIELD HEIGHTS-02-A GARFIELD HEIGHTS-02-B GARFIELD HEIGHTS-02-C GARFIELD HEIGHTS-03-A GARFIELD HEIGHTS-03-B GARFIELD HEIGHTS-04-A GARFIELD HEIGHTS-04-B GARFIELD HEIGHTS-04-C GARFIELD HEIGHTS-05-A GARFIELD HEIGHTS-05-B GARFIELD HEIGHTS-06-A GARFIELD HEIGHTS-06-B GARFIELD HEIGHTS-06-C GARFIELD HEIGHTS-07-A GARFIELD HEIGHTS-07-B GARFIELD HEIGHTS-07-C GATES MILLS-00-A GATES MILLS-00-B HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-01-A HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-01-B HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-02-A HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-02-B HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-03-A HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-03-B HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-04-A HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-04-B HIGHLAND HILLS-00-A LINNDALE-00-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-01-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-01-B MAPLE HEIGHTS-02-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-02-B MAPLE HEIGHTS-03-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-03-B MAPLE HEIGHTS-04-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-04-B MAPLE HEIGHTS-04-C MAPLE HEIGHTS-05-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-05-B MAPLE HEIGHTS-06-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-06-B MAPLE HEIGHTS-07-A MAPLE HEIGHTS-07-B MAPLE HEIGHTS-07-C MAYFIELD VILLAGE-01-A MAYFIELD VILLAGE-02-A MAYFIELD VILLAGE-03-A MAYFIELD VILLAGE-04-A NEWBURGH HEIGHTS-00-A NORTH RANDALL-00-A PARMA HEIGHTS-01-A PARMA HEIGHTS-01-B PARMA HEIGHTS-01-C PARMA HEIGHTS-02-A PARMA HEIGHTS-02-B PARMA HEIGHTS-02-C PARMA HEIGHTS-03-A PARMA HEIGHTS-03-B PARMA HEIGHTS-03-C PARMA HEIGHTS-04-A PARMA HEIGHTS-04-B PARMA HEIGHTS-04-C PARMA-01-A PARMA-01-B PARMA-01-C PARMA-01-D PARMA-01-E PARMA-01-F PARMA-02-A PARMA-02-B PARMA-02-C PARMA-02-D PARMA-02-E PARMA-03-A PARMA-03-B PARMA-03-C PARMA-03-D PARMA-03-E PARMA-03-F PARMA-04-A PARMA-04-B PARMA-04-C PARMA-04-D PARMA-04-E PARMA-05-A PARMA-05-B PARMA-05-C PARMA-05-D PARMA-05-E PARMA-05-F PARMA-06-A PARMA-06-B PARMA-06-C PARMA-06-D PARMA-06-E PARMA-06-F PARMA-07-A PARMA-07-B PARMA-07-C PARMA-07-D PARMA-07-E PARMA-07-F PARMA-08-A PARMA-08-B PARMA-08-C PARMA-08-D PARMA-08-E PARMA-09-A PARMA-09-B PARMA-09-C PARMA-09-D PARMA-09-E PARMA-09-F RICHMOND HEIGHTS-01-A RICHMOND HEIGHTS-01-B RICHMOND HEIGHTS-02-A RICHMOND HEIGHTS-02-B RICHMOND HEIGHTS-03-A RICHMOND HEIGHTS-03-B RICHMOND HEIGHTS-03-C RICHMOND HEIGHTS-04-A RICHMOND HEIGHTS-04-B SEVEN HILLS-01-A SEVEN HILLS-01-B SEVEN HILLS-02-A SEVEN HILLS-02-B SEVEN HILLS-03-A SEVEN HILLS-03-B SEVEN HILLS-04-A SEVEN HILLS-04-B SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-A SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-B SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-C SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-D SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-E SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-F SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-G SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-H SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-I SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-J SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-K SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-L SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-M SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-N SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-O SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-P SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-Q SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-R SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-S SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-T SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-U SOUTH EUCLID-01-A SOUTH EUCLID-01-B SOUTH EUCLID-01-C SOUTH EUCLID-01-D SOUTH EUCLID-02-A SOUTH EUCLID-02-B All D Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-02-C 390351851021001 390351851021002 390351851021003 390351851021006 390351851021007 390351851023007 390351851031000 390351851031001 390351851031002 390351851031003 390351851031004 390351851031005 390351851031006 390351851031008 390351851032000 E Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-03-A SOUTH EUCLID-03-B SOUTH EUCLID-03-C SOUTH EUCLID-04-A SOUTH EUCLID-04-B SOUTH EUCLID-04-C All F Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-04-D 390351852032008 390351852033001 390351852033003 390351852033004 390351852033005 390351852033006 390351852033007 390351852033008 390351852033009 390351852033010 390351852033011 390351852033012 390351852033013 390351852033014 390351852033015 390351852033016 390351852033017 G Cuyahoga UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-A UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-B UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-C UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-D UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-E UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-F UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-G UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-H UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-I WARRENSVILLE HTS-01-A WARRENSVILLE HTS-01-B WARRENSVILLE HTS-02-A WARRENSVILLE HTS-02-B WARRENSVILLE HTS-03-A WARRENSVILLE HTS-04-A WARRENSVILLE HTS-04-B WARRENSVILLE HTS-05-A WARRENSVILLE HTS-05-B WARRENSVILLE HTS-06-A WARRENSVILLE HTS-07-A WARRENSVILLE HTS-07-B All Sec. 3521.0112. The twelfth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Athens All All C Delaware ASHLEY BERKSHIRE A BERKSHIRE B BERKSHIRE C BERKSHIRE D BERKSHIRE E BROWN All D Delaware DELAWARE 4-F 390410111021067 390410111021074 390410111021075 390410111021084 390410111021085 390410111021086 390410111021087 390410122001000 390410122001001 390410122001002 390410122001004 390410122001005 390410122001006 390410122001007 390410122001008 390410122001009 390410122001010 390410122001011 390410122001012 E Delaware DELAWARE 4-G 390410102003037 390410102003048 390410102003049 390410111021069 390410111021070 390410111021071 390410111021072 390410111021073 390410111021076 F Delaware DELAWARE TWP A 390410102003036 390410102003038 G Delaware GALENA HARLEM A HARLEM B HARLEM C HARLEM D KINGSTON A KINGSTON B OXFORD PORTER A PORTER B SUNBURY A SUNBURY B SUNBURY C SUNBURY D TRENTON A TRENTON B All H Fairfield All All I Gallia All All J Hocking All All K Jackson PRECINCT BLOOMFIELD PRECINCT COAL I PRECINCT COAL II PRECINCT FRANKLIN I PRECINCT FRANKLIN II PRECINCT JACKSON 1-A All L Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 2-A 390799575001002 390799576001024 390799576001025 390799576001026 390799576001027 390799576001028 390799576001029 390799576001030 390799576001062 390799576001063 390799576001064 390799576001065 390799576002023 390799576002024 390799576002025 390799576002028 390799576002029 390799576003007 390799576003008 390799576003009 390799576003010 390799576003011 390799576003012 390799576003013 390799576003014 390799576003015 390799576003016 390799576003017 390799576003018 390799576003019 390799576003020 390799576003021 390799576003022 390799576003023 390799576003024 390799576003027 390799576003028 390799576003029 390799576003030 390799576003031 390799576003032 390799576003033 M Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 3-A 390799575001000 390799575001001 390799575001005 390799575001006 390799575001012 390799575001013 390799575001014 390799575001015 390799575001016 390799575001017 390799575001018 390799575001019 390799575001020 390799575001021 390799575001022 390799575001023 390799575001024 390799575001025 390799575001026 390799575001027 390799575001028 390799575001029 390799575001030 390799575002001 390799575002002 390799575002004 390799575002007 390799575002008 390799575002009 390799575002010 390799575002011 390799575002013 390799575002019 390799575002020 390799575002021 390799575006033 390799575006034 390799576001013 390799576001014 390799576001015 390799576001017 390799576001031 390799576001033 390799576001036 390799576001039 390799576001040 390799576001041 390799576001045 390799576001047 390799576001048 390799576001049 390799576001050 390799576001051 390799576001052 390799576001053 390799576001054 390799576001055 390799576001056 390799576001057 390799576001058 390799576001059 390799576001060 390799576001061 390799576001066 390799577002026 390799577002033 390799577002043 390799577002050 390799577002051 390799577002052 390799577002053 390799577002054 390799577002055 390799577002058 390799577002059 390799577002060 390799577002061 390799577002062 390799577002063 390799577002064 390799577002068 390799577002071 390799578001001 390799578001002 N Jackson PRECINCT LICK I 390799573003040 390799573003042 390799573003043 390799573003044 390799573003045 390799574001080 390799574003016 390799575001031 390799575003012 390799575004016 390799575004017 390799575004018 390799575004037 390799575004038 390799575005020 390799575005023 390799575005024 390799575005035 390799575005036 390799575005037 390799575005040 390799575005042 390799575005043 390799575005045 390799575005046 390799575005047 390799575005048 390799575005049 390799575005050 390799575005051 390799575005054 390799575006015 390799575006016 390799575006017 390799575006018 390799575006021 390799575006023 390799575006024 390799575006025 390799575006027 390799575006030 390799575006031 390799575006032 390799575006035 390799575006036 390799575006037 390799576002001 390799576002002 390799576002003 390799576002004 390799576002005 390799576002006 390799576002007 390799576002008 390799576002009 390799576002010 390799576002011 390799576002012 390799576002013 390799576002014 390799576002015 390799576002016 390799576002017 390799576002018 390799576002019 390799576002020 390799576002021 390799576002022 390799576002026 390799576002027 390799576003000 390799577002056 390799577002057 O Jackson PRECINCT LICK II PRECINCT MILTON I PRECINCT WASHINGTON PRECINCT WELLSTON 1-A PRECINCT WELLSTON 2-A PRECINCT WELLSTON 2-B PRECINCT WELLSTON 3-A PRECINCT WELLSTON 4-A All P Lawrence All All Q Licking All All R Meigs All All S Morgan All All T Muskingum All All U Noble All All V Perry All All W Vinton All All X Washington Aurelius Barlow Belpre 1A Belpre 2A Belpre 3A Belpre 4A Bev / Waterford Decatur Dunham East Dunham West Fairfield Little Hocking Lowell / Adams All Y Washington Marietta 2A 391670205002001 391670205002002 391670205002004 391670205002007 391670205002009 391670205002010 391670205002011 391670205002012 391670205002013 391670205002014 391670205002015 391670205002016 391670205002017 391670205002018 391670205002019 391670205002020 391670205002021 391670205002022 391670205002023 391670205002025 391670205002026 391670205002027 391670205002030 391670205002031 391670205002032 391670205002033 391670205002034 391670205002035 391670205002036 391670208003005 391670208003006 391670208003007 391670208003008 391670208003009 391670208003010 391670208003014 391670208003015 391670208003016 391670208003017 391670208003018 391670208003019 391670208003020 391670208003021 391670208003022 391670210002037 391670210002038 391670210002039 391670210002040 Z Washington Marietta 4A Marietta 4B MTTA West MUSK East A MUSK East B All AA Washington MUSK East C 391670209001000 391670209001001 391670209001002 391670209001005 391670209001006 391670209001007 391670209001008 391670209001012 391670209001013 391670210001011 391670213004070 391670213004071 391670213004072 391670214001000 391670214001001 391670214001002 391670214001003 391670214001004 391670214001005 391670214001024 391670214001025 391670214001026 391670214001027 391670214001028 391670214001029 391670214001031 391670214001032 391670214001033 391670214001037 391670214002054 391670214002055 391670214002056 391670214002057 391670214002058 391670214002059 391670214002060 391670214002061 391670214002062 391670214002063 391670214002065 391670214002066 391670214002067 391670214002068 391670214002069 391670214002070 391670214002073 391670214002074 391670214002075 391670214002076 391670214002077 391670214002085 391670214002086 391670214002087 391670214002088 391670214002089 391670214002105 391670214002106 391670214002108 AB Washington MUSK West Palmer Rockland East Rockland West Salem Vincent Warren NE Warren NW Warren South Waterford A Watertown Wesley All Sec. 3521.0113. The thirteenth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Stark CANAL FULTON A CANAL FULTON B CANAL FULTON C CANAL FULTON D CANTON CITY 1-A CANTON CITY 1-B CANTON CITY 1-C CANTON CITY 1-D CANTON CITY 2-A CANTON CITY 2-B CANTON CITY 2-C CANTON CITY 2-D CANTON CITY 2-E CANTON CITY 3-A CANTON CITY 3-B CANTON CITY 3-C CANTON CITY 3-D CANTON CITY 3-E CANTON CITY 4-A CANTON CITY 4-B CANTON CITY 4-C CANTON CITY 4-D CANTON CITY 4-E CANTON CITY 4-F CANTON CITY 5-A CANTON CITY 5-B CANTON CITY 5-C CANTON CITY 5-D CANTON CITY 6-A CANTON CITY 6-B CANTON CITY 6-C CANTON CITY 6-D CANTON CITY 7-A CANTON CITY 7-B CANTON CITY 7-C CANTON CITY 7-D CANTON CITY 7-E CANTON CITY 7-F CANTON CITY 7-G CANTON CITY 8-A CANTON CITY 8-B CANTON CITY 8-C CANTON CITY 8-D CANTON CITY 8-E CANTON CITY 8-F CANTON CITY 8-G CANTON CITY 9-A CANTON CITY 9-B CANTON CITY 9-C CANTON CITY 9-D CANTON CITY 9-E CANTON CITY 9-F CANTON CITY 9-G All C Stark CANTON TWP 1 391517012003021 391517012003029 391517023001135 391517025001063 391517025002008 391517025002009 391517025002024 391517025002025 391517025002038 391517025002039 391517132012028 391517132021001 391517132021002 391517132021003 391517132021004 391517132021005 391517132021012 391517132021013 391517132021014 391517132021015 391517132021016 391517132021018 391517132021019 391517132021020 391517132021027 391517132021028 391517132021029 391517132021057 391517133001000 391517133001003 391517133001004 391517133001005 391517133001007 391517133001009 391517133003000 391517133003016 391517133003017 391517133003021 391517134013000 391517134013001 391517134013029 D Stark CANTON TWP 3 All E Stark CANTON TWP 6 391517018003001 391517018003002 391517018003005 391517018003009 391517018003024 391517018003025 391517018003053 391517018003058 391517021003110 391517124002068 391517124002069 391517124002076 391517124002077 391517124002078 391517124002079 391517124002080 391517124002081 391517124002082 391517124002088 391517124002089 391517124002090 391517124002091 391517124002092 391517124002093 391517124002094 391517124002095 391517124002096 391517124002097 391517124002098 391517124002099 391517131003000 391517131003001 391517131003002 391517131003003 391517131003004 391517131003005 391517131003006 391517131003007 391517131003008 391517131003011 391517131003012 391517131003013 391517131003014 391517131003015 391517131003016 391517131003017 391517131003018 391517131003019 391517131003020 391517131003021 391517131003022 391517131003023 391517131003024 391517131003051 391517131004000 391517131004001 391517131004003 391517131004004 391517131004006 391517131004007 391517131004009 391517131004011 391517131004012 391517131004019 391517131004020 391517131004023 391517131004024 391517131004025 391517131004026 391517131004027 391517131004028 391517131004029 391517131004030 391517131004031 391517131004033 391517131004034 391517131005008 391517131005009 391517131005010 391517131005011 391517131005012 391517131005014 391517131005015 391517131005016 391517131005017 F Stark JACKSON TWP 1 JACKSON TWP 10 JACKSON TWP 11 JACKSON TWP 12 JACKSON TWP 13 JACKSON TWP 14 JACKSON TWP 15 JACKSON TWP 16 JACKSON TWP 17 JACKSON TWP 18 JACKSON TWP 19 JACKSON TWP 2 JACKSON TWP 20 JACKSON TWP 21 JACKSON TWP 22 JACKSON TWP 23 JACKSON TWP 24 JACKSON TWP 25 JACKSON TWP 26 JACKSON TWP 27 JACKSON TWP 28 JACKSON TWP 29 JACKSON TWP 3 JACKSON TWP 30 JACKSON TWP 31 JACKSON TWP 32 JACKSON TWP 33 JACKSON TWP 4 JACKSON TWP 5 JACKSON TWP 6 JACKSON TWP 7 JACKSON TWP 8 JACKSON TWP 9 LAWRENCE TWP 1 LAWRENCE TWP 2 LAWRENCE TWP 3 LAWRENCE TWP 4 LAWRENCE TWP 5 LAWRENCE TWP 6 MASSILLON 1-A MASSILLON 1-B MASSILLON 1-C MASSILLON 1-D MASSILLON 1-E MASSILLON 2-A MASSILLON 2-B MASSILLON 2-C MASSILLON 2-D MASSILLON 3-A MASSILLON 3-B MASSILLON 3-C MASSILLON 3-D MASSILLON 3-E MASSILLON 4-A MASSILLON 4-B MASSILLON 4-C MASSILLON 5-A All G Stark MASSILLON 5-B 391517141001021 391517141001023 391517141001024 391517141001025 391517141001026 391517141001027 391517141001028 391517141001029 391517141001030 391517141001031 391517141001032 391517141001033 391517141001034 391517141001035 391517141001036 391517141001038 391517141001039 391517141001040 391517141001041 391517141001042 391517141002000 391517141002001 391517141002004 391517141002005 391517141002006 391517141002007 391517141002008 391517141002009 391517141002011 391517141002012 391517141002013 391517141002014 391517141002015 391517141002016 391517141002017 391517141002019 391517141002022 391517141002023 391517141004000 391517141004001 391517141004002 391517141004003 391517141004004 391517141004008 391517141004009 391517141004010 391517141004011 391517141004012 391517141004013 391517142004016 391517142004017 391517144002033 H Stark MASSILLON 5-C MASSILLON 6-A MASSILLON 6-B MASSILLON 6-C MASSILLON 6-D MEYERS LAKE VILLAGE A NORTH CANTON 1-A NORTH CANTON 1-B NORTH CANTON 1-C NORTH CANTON 2-A NORTH CANTON 2-B NORTH CANTON 2-C NORTH CANTON 2-D NORTH CANTON 3-A NORTH CANTON 3-B NORTH CANTON 3-C NORTH CANTON 4-A NORTH CANTON 4-B NORTH CANTON 4-C All I Stark OSNABURG TWP 3 391517131005043 391517131005044 J Stark PERRY TWP 1 PERRY TWP 10 PERRY TWP 11 PERRY TWP 12 PERRY TWP 13 PERRY TWP 14 PERRY TWP 15 PERRY TWP 16 PERRY TWP 17 PERRY TWP 18 PERRY TWP 19 PERRY TWP 2 PERRY TWP 3 All K Stark PERRY TWP 4 391517144001016 391517144001020 391517144001021 391517144001022 391517144001024 391517144001025 391517144001026 391517144001027 391517144001028 391517144001029 391517144001030 391517144002005 391517144002008 391517144002020 391517144002024 391517144002046 391517144002049 391517144002050 391517146001012 391517146001013 391517146001014 391517146001015 391517146001016 391517146001017 391517146001018 391517146001019 391517146001020 391517146001021 391517146001022 391517146001023 391517146001024 391517146001025 391517146002003 391517146002006 391517146002007 391517146002008 391517146002038 391517146002039 391517146002040 391517146002041 391517146002053 391517146002054 391517146002055 391517146002056 391517146002057 391517146002058 391517146002059 391517146002064 391517146002065 391517146002066 391517146002068 391517146002070 391517146002090 391517146002091 L Stark PERRY TWP 5 PERRY TWP 6 PERRY TWP 7 PERRY TWP 8 PERRY TWP 9 PLAIN TWP 1 PLAIN TWP 10 PLAIN TWP 11 PLAIN TWP 12 PLAIN TWP 13 PLAIN TWP 14 PLAIN TWP 15 PLAIN TWP 16 PLAIN TWP 17 PLAIN TWP 18 PLAIN TWP 19 PLAIN TWP 2 PLAIN TWP 20 PLAIN TWP 21 PLAIN TWP 22 All M Stark PLAIN TWP 23 391517002001012 391517002001013 391517002001014 391517002001017 391517002001018 391517002001019 391517002001020 391517002001021 391517002001022 391517002001023 391517002001029 391517002001032 391517002001034 391517002001036 391517002001048 391517002001051 391517002001052 391517002001053 391517002001054 391517002001055 391517002001056 391517002001062 391517002001064 391517002001065 391517002001071 391517002001072 391517002001073 391517002001074 391517002001077 391517002001078 391517002001079 391517002001080 391517002001081 391517002001082 391517002001083 391517002001084 391517004002000 391517004002032 391517124002004 N Stark PLAIN TWP 24 PLAIN TWP 25 PLAIN TWP 26 PLAIN TWP 27 PLAIN TWP 28 PLAIN TWP 3 PLAIN TWP 4 PLAIN TWP 5 PLAIN TWP 6 PLAIN TWP 7 PLAIN TWP 8 PLAIN TWP 9 TUSCARAWAS TWP 1 All O Stark TUSCARAWAS TWP 2 391517140001000 391517140003003 391517140003004 391517140003009 391517140003012 391517147012017 391517147012018 391517147012020 391517147012030 391517147012031 391517147012032 391517147012037 391517147012039 391517147012060 391517147012061 391517147012062 P Summit All All Sec. 3521.0114. The fourteenth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Ashtabula All All C Geauga All All D Lake All All E Mahoning AUSTINTOWN 1 AUSTINTOWN 10 AUSTINTOWN 11 AUSTINTOWN 12 AUSTINTOWN 13 AUSTINTOWN 14 AUSTINTOWN 15 AUSTINTOWN 16 AUSTINTOWN 17 AUSTINTOWN 18 AUSTINTOWN 19 AUSTINTOWN 2 AUSTINTOWN 20 AUSTINTOWN 21 AUSTINTOWN 22 AUSTINTOWN 23 AUSTINTOWN 24 AUSTINTOWN 25 AUSTINTOWN 26 AUSTINTOWN 27 AUSTINTOWN 28 AUSTINTOWN 29 AUSTINTOWN 3 AUSTINTOWN 30 AUSTINTOWN 31 AUSTINTOWN 32 AUSTINTOWN 33 AUSTINTOWN 4 AUSTINTOWN 5 AUSTINTOWN 6 AUSTINTOWN 7 AUSTINTOWN 8 AUSTINTOWN 9 BOARDMAN 1 BOARDMAN 10 BOARDMAN 11 BOARDMAN 12 BOARDMAN 13 BOARDMAN 14 BOARDMAN 15 BOARDMAN 16 BOARDMAN 17 BOARDMAN 18 BOARDMAN 19 BOARDMAN 2 BOARDMAN 20 BOARDMAN 21 BOARDMAN 22 BOARDMAN 23 BOARDMAN 24 BOARDMAN 25 BOARDMAN 26 BOARDMAN 27 BOARDMAN 28 BOARDMAN 29 BOARDMAN 3 BOARDMAN 30 BOARDMAN 31 BOARDMAN 32 BOARDMAN 33 BOARDMAN 34 BOARDMAN 35 BOARDMAN 36 BOARDMAN 37 BOARDMAN 4 BOARDMAN 5 BOARDMAN 6 BOARDMAN 7 BOARDMAN 8 BOARDMAN 9 CAMPBELL 1A CAMPBELL 1B CAMPBELL 2A CAMPBELL 2B CAMPBELL 2C CAMPBELL 3A CAMPBELL 3B CAMPBELL 4A CAMPBELL 4B CANFIELD 1 CANFIELD 2 CANFIELD 3 CANFIELD 4 CANFIELD 5 CANFIELD 6 CANFIELD CITY 7 CANFIELD CITY 8 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 1 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 2 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 3 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 4 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 5 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 6 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 7 CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 8 All F Mahoning COITSVILLE 02 390998137003003 G Mahoning YOUNGSTOWN 1A YOUNGSTOWN 1B YOUNGSTOWN 1C YOUNGSTOWN 1D YOUNGSTOWN 1E YOUNGSTOWN 1F YOUNGSTOWN 2A YOUNGSTOWN 2B YOUNGSTOWN 2C YOUNGSTOWN 2D YOUNGSTOWN 2E YOUNGSTOWN 2F YOUNGSTOWN 3A YOUNGSTOWN 3B YOUNGSTOWN 3C YOUNGSTOWN 3D YOUNGSTOWN 3E YOUNGSTOWN 3F YOUNGSTOWN 4A YOUNGSTOWN 4B YOUNGSTOWN 4C YOUNGSTOWN 4D YOUNGSTOWN 4E YOUNGSTOWN 4F YOUNGSTOWN 5A YOUNGSTOWN 5B YOUNGSTOWN 5C YOUNGSTOWN 5D YOUNGSTOWN 5E YOUNGSTOWN 5F YOUNGSTOWN 5G YOUNGSTOWN 6A YOUNGSTOWN 6B YOUNGSTOWN 6C YOUNGSTOWN 6D YOUNGSTOWN 6E YOUNGSTOWN 6F YOUNGSTOWN 6G YOUNGSTOWN 7A YOUNGSTOWN 7B YOUNGSTOWN 7C YOUNGSTOWN 7E YOUNGSTOWN 7F All H Mahoning YOUNGSTOWN 7G 390998013002013 390998013002014 390998013002016 390998013003009 390998014001000 390998014001001 390998014001005 390998014001006 390998014001012 I Trumbull All All Sec. 3521.0115. The fifteenth congressional district contains the following territory: 1 2 3 A County Voting districts Census blocks B Delaware BERLIN A BERLIN B BERLIN C BERLIN D BERLIN E BERLIN F COLUMBUS A COLUMBUS B COLUMBUS C COLUMBUS D COLUMBUS E COLUMBUS F COLUMBUS G CONCORD A CONCORD B CONCORD C CONCORD D CONCORD E CONCORD F CONCORD G CONCORD H CONCORD I CONCORD J DELAWARE 1-A DELAWARE 1-B DELAWARE 1-C DELAWARE 1-D DELAWARE 1-E DELAWARE 1-F DELAWARE 1-G DELAWARE 2-A DELAWARE 2-B DELAWARE 2-C DELAWARE 2-D DELAWARE 2-E DELAWARE 2-F DELAWARE 2-G DELAWARE 3-A DELAWARE 3-B DELAWARE 3-C DELAWARE 3-D DELAWARE 3-E DELAWARE 3-F DELAWARE 3-G DELAWARE 3-H DELAWARE 4-A DELAWARE 4-B DELAWARE 4-C DELAWARE 4-D DELAWARE 4-E All C Delaware DELAWARE 4-F 390410102002001 390410102002002 390410102002003 390410102002004 390410102002005 390410102002006 390410102002010 390410102002011 390410102002016 390410102002017 390410102002018 390410102002019 390410102002020 390410102002021 390410102002025 390410102002026 390410102002027 390410102002028 390410102003044 390410102004022 390410102004023 390410102004024 390410102004025 390410102004026 390410102004027 390410102004029 390410102004031 390410102004032 390410102004033 390410102004036 390410102004037 390410111021089 390410115621005 390410115621006 390410122001003 390410122001013 390410122001063 390410122001064 D Delaware DELAWARE 4-G 390410102003024 390410102003025 390410102003026 390410102003027 390410102003028 390410102003029 390410102003030 390410102003031 390410102003032 390410102003033 390410102003034 390410102003035 390410102003039 390410102003040 390410102003041 390410102003042 390410102003043 390410102003051 E Delaware DELAWARE TWP A 390410102001000 390410102001001 390410102001002 390410102001003 390410102001004 390410102001005 390410102001009 390410102001010 390410102001011 390410102001012 390410102001015 390410102001017 390410102001018 390410102001025 390410102001026 390410102003000 390410102003002 390410102003011 390410102003015 390410104202010 390410104202017 390410104202021 390410104202023 390410104211000 390410104211001 390410104211009 390410104212008 390410104212014 390410104212015 390410104221000 390410104221014 390410104221030 390410104222013 390410104222014 390410104223002 390410105202006 390410105204006 390410105204011 390410105204012 390410105204014 390410105204016 390410105204017 390410105205003 390410122002004 390410122002007 390410122002016 390410122002017 390410122003002 390410122003004 390410122003005 390410122003011 390410122003012 390410122003021 390410122003022 390410122003030 390410122003031 390410122003033 390410122003034 390410122003035 390410122003036 390410122003037 390410122003038 390410122003042 390410122003043 390410122003044 F Delaware DELAWARE TWP B DUBLIN A DUBLIN B DUBLIN C DUBLIN D GENOA A GENOA B GENOA C GENOA D GENOA E GENOA F GENOA G GENOA H GENOA I GENOA J GENOA K GENOA L GENOA M GENOA N GENOA O GENOA P GENOA Q GENOA R GENOA S GENOA T LIBERTY A LIBERTY B LIBERTY C LIBERTY D LIBERTY E LIBERTY F LIBERTY G LIBERTY H LIBERTY I LIBERTY J LIBERTY K LIBERTY L LIBERTY M LIBERTY N MARLBORO ORANGE A ORANGE B ORANGE C ORANGE D ORANGE E ORANGE F ORANGE G ORANGE H ORANGE I ORANGE J ORANGE K ORANGE L ORANGE M ORANGE N ORANGE O ORANGE P ORANGE Q ORANGE R ORANGE S ORANGE T ORANGE U OSTRANDER POWELL A POWELL B POWELL C POWELL D POWELL E POWELL F POWELL G POWELL H POWELL I POWELL J POWELL K RADNOR SCIOTO A SCIOTO B SHAWNEE HILLS THOMPSON TROY A TROY B WESTERVILLE A WESTERVILLE B WESTERVILLE C WESTERVILLE D WESTERVILLE E WESTERVILLE F WESTERVILLE G WESTERVILLE H WESTERVILLE I All G Franklin BLENDON-A BLENDON-B All H Franklin BLENDON-C 390490071141015 390490071141016 390490071141020 390490071141021 390490071141023 390490071143000 390490071143002 390490071143003 390490071143022 390490071144000 390490071144001 390490071144002 390490071144003 390490071144004 390490071144005 390490071144013 390490071144014 390490071144015 390490071202003 390490071202006 390490071202007 390490071202008 390490071202009 390490071203000 390490071203003 390490071203004 390490071203011 390490071203012 390490071203013 390490071203014 390490071203015 390490071203016 390490071203017 390490071203018 390490071203030 390490071203041 390490071203042 390490071203043 390490071991000 I Franklin BLENDON-D BLENDON-E BLENDON-F BROWN-A BROWN-B CLINTON-C All J Franklin COLS 02-A 390490056101012 390490056101013 390490056101014 390490056101015 390490056101021 390490056101023 390490056201006 390490056201007 390490056204001 390490056204005 390490056204006 K Franklin COLS 02-B 390490057004025 390490058101015 390490058101016 L Franklin COLS 02-C COLS 02-D COLS 02-E COLS 02-F COLS 08-C COLS 08-D All M Franklin COLS 08-E 390490052001000 390490052001001 390490052003000 390490052003001 N Franklin COLS 09-A 390490043021036 390490043021037 390490043021039 390490043021059 390490043021060 390490043021061 390490043021064 390490043023000 390490043023002 390490049001000 390490049005000 390490049005007 390490050021000 390490050021001 390490050021002 390490050021003 390490050021004 390490050021005 390490050021006 390490050021007 390490050021008 390490050021009 390490050021010 390490050021011 390490050021012 390490050021013 390490050021014 390490050021015 390490050021016 390490050022010 390490050022011 390490050022012 390490050023000 390490050023001 390490050023002 390490050023003 390490050023004 390490050023005 390490050023006 390490050023007 390490050023008 390490050023009 390490050023010 390490050023011 390490050023012 390490050023013 390490050023014 390490050023015 390490050023016 390490050024001 390490050024002 390490050024003 390490050024004 390490050024007 390490050024008 390490050024009 390490050024010 390490050024011 390490050024012 390490050024013 390490050024014 390490050024015 390490050024016 390490050024019 390490050024020 390490050024021 O Franklin COLS 09-B COLS 10-A All P Franklin COLS 10-B 390490043011009 390490043021015 390490043021016 390490043021017 390490043021025 390490043021026 390490043021027 390490043021028 390490043021029 390490043021030 390490043021031 390490043021032 390490043021033 390490043021063 Q Franklin COLS 10-C 390490043021038 390490043022000 390490043022001 390490043022002 390490043022003 390490043022004 390490043022005 390490043022006 390490043023001 390490043023003 390490043023004 390490043023005 390490043023006 R Franklin COLS 14-A COLS 14-B COLS 14-C COLS 14-D COLS 14-E COLS 14-F COLS 14-G COLS 15-A COLS 15-B COLS 16-A COLS 16-B All S Franklin COLS 16-D 390490012001004 390490012002000 390490012002001 390490012002002 390490012002003 T Franklin COLS 16-E COLS 18-A COLS 18-B COLS 18-C COLS 18-D COLS 18-E COLS 18-F COLS 19-A COLS 19-B COLS 19-C COLS 19-D COLS 19-E COLS 19-F COLS 19-G COLS 19-H COLS 20-A COLS 20-B COLS 20-C COLS 21-A COLS 21-B COLS 21-C COLS 21-D COLS 21-E COLS 21-F COLS 22-A COLS 22-B COLS 22-C All U Franklin COLS 22-D 390490077302006 390490077401011 V Franklin COLS 22-G All W Franklin COLS 24-C 390490003102019 390490003102020 390490003102035 390490003102036 390490007104004 390490007104005 X Franklin COLS 30-C 390490069212000 390490069212001 390490069212002 390490069212004 390490069212005 Y Franklin COLS 33-A COLS 33-B COLS 33-C COLS 33-D COLS 33-E COLS 33-F COLS 33-G COLS 33-H COLS 33-I COLS 33-J COLS 37-A All Z Franklin COLS 37-B 390490051002001 390490051002002 390490051002003 390490051002004 390490051002009 390490051002011 390490051002012 390490051002043 AA Franklin COLS 38-C 390490049001003 390490050022006 390490050022007 390490050022008 390490050022009 390490050022026 390490051002026 390490051002027 AB Franklin COLS 39-A COLS 39-B COLS 39-C COLS 39-D COLS 40-A COLS 40-B COLS 40-C COLS 41-A COLS 41-B COLS 41-C COLS 41-D COLS 41-F COLS 41-G COLS 41-H COLS 41-I All AC Franklin COLS 43-A 390490002201000 390490003102016 390490003102018 390490003102021 AD Franklin COLS 59-A COLS 59-B COLS 59-C COLS 59-D COLS 59-E COLS 59-F COLS 60-A COLS 60-B COLS 60-C COLS 60-D COLS 60-E COLS 60-F COLS 60-G All AE Franklin COLS 61-D 390490069444000 390490069444001 390490069911017 390490069911025 390490069911026 AF Franklin COLS 62-B 390490072022017 390490072022018 390490072022019 AG Franklin COLS 62-C COLS 63-A COLS 63-B COLS 63-C COLS 63-D COLS 63-E COLS 63-F COLS 63-G COLS 63-H COLS 64-A COLS 64-B COLS 64-C COLS 64-D COLS 64-E COLS 64-F COLS 64-G COLS 64-H COLS 65-A COLS 65-B COLS 65-C COLS 65-D COLS 65-E COLS 65-F COLS 65-G All AH Franklin COLS 66-F 390490069911024 390490071141007 390490071141012 390490071141013 390490071141014 390490071141017 390490071141018 AI Franklin COLS 69-A COLS 69-B COLS 69-C COLS 69-D COLS 69-E COLS 69-F COLS 69-G COLS 69-H COLS 69-I COLS 69-J COLS 69-K COLS 69-L COLS 69-M COLS 69-N COLS 70-A COLS 70-B COLS 70-C COLS 70-D COLS 70-E COLS 71-A COLS 71-B COLS 71-C COLS 71-D COLS 71-E COLS 71-F COLS 72-A COLS 72-B COLS 72-C COLS 72-D COLS 72-E COLS 72-F COLS 72-G COLS 73-A COLS 73-B COLS 73-C COLS 73-D COLS 73-E COLS 73-F COLS 73-G COLS 73-H COLS 73-I COLS 73-J COLS 73-K COLS 73-L COLS 73-M COLS 74-A COLS 74-B COLS 74-C COLS 74-D COLS 74-E COLS 74-F COLS 74-G COLS 74-H COLS 75-A COLS 75-B COLS 75-C COLS 75-D COLS 75-E COLS 75-F COLS 75-G COLS 75-H COLS 75-I COLS 76-A COLS 76-B COLS 76-C COLS 76-D COLS 76-E COLS 76-F COLS 76-G All AJ Franklin COLS 77-A 390490079412005 390490079412019 390490079412020 390490079412022 390490079412023 390490079412024 390490079412025 390490079412027 390490079412028 390490079412029 390490079412038 AK Franklin COLS 77-B COLS 77-C COLS 77-D COLS 77-E COLS 77-F COLS 78-A COLS 78-B COLS 78-C COLS 78-E COLS 78-F COLS 78-G COLS 78-I COLS 80-A COLS 80-B COLS 80-C COLS 80-D COLS 80-E COLS 80-F COLS 82-A COLS 82-B COLS 82-C COLS 82-D COLS 82-E COLS 82-F COLS 82-G COLS 82-H COLS 82-I COLS 82-J COLS 82-K COLS 82-L COLS 82-M COLS 82-N COLS 82-O DUB 1-A DUB 1-B DUB 1-C DUB 1-D DUB 1-E DUB 1-F DUB 1-G DUB 1-H DUB 1-I DUB 2-A DUB 2-B DUB 2-C DUB 2-D DUB 2-E DUB 2-F DUB 2-G DUB 2-H DUB 2-I DUB 2-J DUB 3-A DUB 3-B DUB 3-C DUB 4-A DUB 4-B DUB 4-C DUB 4-D DUB 4-E DUB 4-F All AL Franklin FRANKLIN-C 390490079412033 390490079412034 390490079652009 390490079652010 390490079652011 390490081721000 390490081721001 390490081721006 390490082421022 390490082421023 390490082421028 390490082421029 390490082421030 390490082421031 AM Franklin GRANDVIEW-A GRANDVIEW-B GRANDVIEW-C GRANDVIEW-D GRANDVIEW-E GRANDVIEW-F HILL 1-A HILL 1-B HILL 1-C HILL 1-D HILL 1-E HILL 1-F HILL 1-G HILL 2-A HILL 2-B HILL 2-C HILL 2-D HILL 2-E HILL 2-F HILL 3-A HILL 3-B HILL 3-C HILL 3-D HILL 3-E HILL 4-A HILL 4-B HILL 4-C HILL 4-D HILL 4-E MARBLE CLIFF-A NEW ALBANY-A NEW ALBANY-B NEW ALBANY-C NEW ALBANY-D NEW ALBANY-E NEW ALBANY-F NEW ALBANY-G All AN Franklin NORWICH-A 390490079412017 390490079412018 390490079412031 390490079412039 390490079591003 390490079591010 390490079591011 390490079591015 390490079591017 390490079591018 390490079591019 390490079591020 390490079591021 390490079591022 390490079591023 390490079592000 390490079592002 390490079592003 390490079592004 390490079592005 390490079592006 390490079592007 390490079592010 390490079592011 390490079592012 390490079601012 390490079601016 390490079602004 390490079602005 390490079602008 390490079611008 390490079611009 390490079611011 390490079611012 390490079612011 390490079621003 390490079621006 390490079621008 390490079621009 390490079621026 390490079621029 390490079621038 390490080012026 390490080012027 390490080012029 390490080012030 390490080012031 390490106011012 390490106011017 390490106011026 390490106012001 390490106013017 AO Franklin NORWICH-B NORWICH-C NORWICH-D PERRY-A PERRY-B PERRY-C PERRY-D PLAIN-A PLAIN-B All AP Franklin PRAIRIE-C 390490079592008 390490079592009 390490079652012 390490079652014 390490080012028 390490081652002 390490081662001 390490081662009 390490081662011 390490081662012 390490081662013 390490081662014 390490081662019 390490081662020 390490081662021 390490081662022 390490081662023 390490081662024 390490081662025 390490081662026 390490081662032 390490081662033 390490081662035 390490081662036 390490081711016 390490081712001 390490081712012 390490081712016 390490081712017 390490081712024 390490081712026 390490081721007 390490081721012 390490081721017 390490081721023 390490081721025 390490081721026 390490081721027 390490081721038 390490081721039 390490081721043 390490081722002 390490081722003 390490081722004 390490081722006 390490081722007 390490081722014 390490081722015 390490081722016 390490081722018 390490081722020 390490081722027 390490081722028 AQ Franklin RIVERLEA-A All AR Franklin SHARON-A 390490063911000 390490063911002 390490063911009 390490063911021 390490063911022 390490063911023 390490063911024 390490063911025 390490063911026 390490063912011 390490063913002 390490063913003 390490063913004 390490063913005 390490063913006 390490063913007 390490063913010 390490063913011 390490063913012 390490069911015 390490069911018 390490069911019 390490069912000 390490069912001 390490069921001 390490069921002 390490069921008 390490070411013 390490070411014 390490070411021 390490070431003 390490070432000 390490070432004 390490070432005 390490070432006 390490070432007 390490070432008 390490070432015 390490070432034 390490070432037 390490070441007 390490070442001 390490070442008 390490070442009 390490070442012 390490070442013 390490070442016 390490070471012 390490070471013 390490070471014 390490070471015 AS Franklin SHARON-B UA 1-A UA 1-B UA 1-C UA 1-D UA 1-E UA 1-F UA 2-A UA 2-B UA 2-C UA 2-D UA 2-E UA 2-F UA 3-A UA 3-B UA 3-C UA 3-D UA 4-A UA 4-B UA 4-C UA 4-D UA 4-E UA 5-A UA 5-B UA 5-C UA 5-D UA 5-E UA 6-A UA 6-B UA 6-C UA 6-D UA 6-E WASHINGTON-A WESTERVILLE 1-A WESTERVILLE 1-B WESTERVILLE 1-C WESTERVILLE 1-D WESTERVILLE 1-E WESTERVILLE 2-A WESTERVILLE 2-B WESTERVILLE 2-C WESTERVILLE 2-D WESTERVILLE 2-E WESTERVILLE 2-F WESTERVILLE 2-G WESTERVILLE 3-A WESTERVILLE 3-B WESTERVILLE 3-C WESTERVILLE 3-D WESTERVILLE 3-E WESTERVILLE 4-A WESTERVILLE 4-B WESTERVILLE 4-C WESTERVILLE 5-A WESTERVILLE 5-B WESTERVILLE 5-C WESTERVILLE 5-D WESTERVILLE 5-E WORTH 1-A WORTH 1-B WORTH 1-C WORTH 1-D WORTH 2-A WORTH 2-B WORTH 2-C WORTH 3-A WORTH 3-B WORTH 3-C WORTH 3-D WORTH 4-A WORTH 4-B WORTH 4-C WORTH 4-D All AT Union All All Section 2. That existing section 3521.01 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 3521.011, 3521.012, 3521.013, 3521.014, 3521.015, 3521.016, 3521.017, 3521.018, 3521.019, 3521.0110, 3521.0111, 3521.0112, 3521.0113, 3521.0114, and 3521.0115 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.